JAPAN:      Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Research Organizations 
Predict Little Growth in FY94; FEATURE:  MITI Council's Report on 
Capital Investment Trends 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Hyogo Bank Still in Critical 
Condition Despite MOF Support 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CENTRAL ASIAN REPUBLICS:  EBRD To 
Help Japanese Trading Companies Exploit Gold Resources 

   RUSSIA: Hosokawa Micron To Supply Environmental Equipment to 
Smelter 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  Shortages of Electronic Parts in Southeast Asia; 
Tsubakimoto Opens Office in Thailand; Japanese Business Mission Goes 
to Vietnam 

   Japan-U.S. Economic Relations - FEATURE:  U.S. Officials 
Criticize Japan's Economic Bureaucrats 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  Machine Tool Companies 
Continue Retrenchment Steps 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  Articles Assess 
Foreign Semiconductor Market Share Issue; Semiconductor 
Manufacturing Equipment Sales Up Sharply in October; U.S. Replaces 
Japan as Leader in Semiconductor Market Share 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - NEC Trial-Produces Digital Mobile 
Phone for U.S. Market; NTT To Establish Specialized Office for 
Multimedia Activities 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Planned Overhaul of Corporations 
To Emulate Japanese Groupings; Shenzhen Company Involved in Record 
Equity Transfer Deal; First VCR Plant Begins Production in Dalian; 
Zhejiang Is First Province To Have Complete Mobile Phone Network 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Barclays Bank Arranges $4O-Million 
Telecommunications Loan; Planned Sino-Indonesian Center To Boost 
Exports; Qingdao Attracts Large Amounts of Asia-Pacific Investment; 
Hong Kong Regains Position as World's Biggest Container Port; Hong 
Kong TV Maker Targets Mainland Market for Expansion; Jiangsu 
Economic, Technological Development Zone Attracts Foreigners 

   Taiwan:  Finance Ministry To Remove More Limits on Financial 
Investment; Economic Cooperation Agreement Signed With Turkey; 
Foreign Investment in Stock Market Estimated To Quadruple in 1993; 
Exports to U.S., Hong Kong Outlined; Investment in PRC Climbs; KMT- 
Run Enterprises Will Not Be Allowed To Invest in the PRC; GATT 
Membership To Impact on Automotive Regulations 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Russian Researcher Documents Decline of 
North Korean Economy; South Korea Sees DPRK's 1993 Economic 
Performance as Worst Eve; North Korea Claims Improved Method of 
Producing Riced Corn Flour 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Press Calls for Environmental Awareness; 
FEATURE:  Government Wavers on Mid-Size Airplane Project; FEATURE: 
KEPCO Official Outlines Plans for Nuclear Power; FEATURE:  ROK Firms 
Market Workstations Based on U.S. High-Tech; FEATURE:  Hyundai, 
Samsung Introduce New Combat Vehicles; Magazine Profiles Financially 
Troubled U.S. High-Tech Employees; Samsung Develops ROK's First 
Indigenous Color CRT's; KOTRA Expanding, Automating Commercial 
Intelligence Network; Tariff Reductions on High-Tech Imports 
Extended; KEPCO Wins Contract To Provide Nuclear Technology to 
China; Kodeco Energy To Develop Oil, Gas Facilities in Indonesia; 
Tongbu Group To Expand Overseas Business 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Singapore Top Investor in Non-Gas 
Sector; Non-Gas Exports to Japan Increase 

   LAOS:  Nam Song Water Project With Japan Signed; Exports, Imports 
for 1993 Reported 

   PHILIPPINES:  Finland To Supply Digital Cellular Equipment; 
Investment Board Approves Geothermal, Cement Projects; Volvo To 
Establish Assembly Plant; Investments in Processing Zones Hit $107 
Million in 1993 

   SINGAPORE:  Government Sets Up $6OO-Million Industrial 
Development Fund; Aerospace Industry Reports 6.2-Percent Growth in 
1993 

   THAILAND:  Central Bank Reviews Growth, Balance of Payments; Siam 
Steel To Invest in Three Projects 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Privatization of State Enterprises Slower 
Than Expected; Air Traffic Control To Receive $26-Million Upgrade; 
Foreign Investment in Agriculture Noted; Increase in Ho Chi Minh 
City Production Reported; Garment Industry Production Noted; French, 
Thai, Local Companies Enter Liquid Gas Venture; Aid From French 
Ministry of Finance Reported; Association Reports Record Output in 
1993; Hanoi's Industrial Production Grows 16.8 Percent; Expansion of 
Hoang Thach Cement Plant Commences; Ayun River, Be River Dammed for 
Irrigation, Electric Projects; Postal Sector's Phone Service Reports 
Increase in Revenues; Foreign Investments in Quang Nam-Da Nang Noted 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-01) 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Research Organizations 
Predict Little Growth in FY94 -- SUMMARY:  According to press 
reports, forecasts made by most private economic research 
organizations for FY94 project that Japan's economy will remain at a 
standstill until the summer of 1994 and then will gradually move 
upward in a very weak recovery.  The average of the predictions for 
FY94's real gross domestic product (GDP) is an increase of 0.6 
percent.  To avoid calls for issuance of deficit financing bonds 
during deliberations on the FY94 budget, government ministries are 
expected to publicize an optimistic outlook of about 2.5 percent 
real GDP growth. 

   Most private economic research organizations predict that Japan's 
economy will remain stagnant until the summer of 1994 and then 
gradually turn upward thanks to a gradual recovery of personal 
consumption after an anticipated income tax cut and a slight 
recovery in exports as the value of the yen stabilizes, according to 
the 21 December NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Since the recovery 
is expected to be "very weak," the research organizations anticipate 
that businessmen will be slow to recognize any improvement in 
economic conditions during 1994.  The paper notes that the weak 
recovery will be primarily due to the problem of nonperforming bank 
assets, the uncertain employment situation, and corporate 
restructuring, "all of which may last for most of FY94." 

   The average of real GDP growth rates for FY94 as forecast by 48 
private organizations is 0.6 percent, according to the 30 December 
NIKKEI.  Most forecasts assume a 5-10 trillion yen ($48-92 billion) 
cut in personal income and local taxes, 2-5 trillion yen ($19-48 
billion) in additional public investment, and a cut of 05-1.0 
percent in the official discount rate (ODR). 

   According to the 17 December YOMIURI SHIMBUN, the "most 
pessimistic" forecast is a 0.4 percent decrease in real GDP 
predicted by the Nomura Research Institute (NRI).  NRI predicts that 
Japan's economy will continue having difficulty escaping asset 
deflation caused by the bursting bubble in stock and land prices. 
Unless the government takes "drastic" measures to solve the problem 
of bank nonperforming assets, NRI maintains, "severe" economic 
conditions will continue throughout FY94.  According to the 18 
December YOMIURI, Daiichi Life Insurance predicts a O.3 percent 
decrease in real GDP.  It points to a 3.8 percent decrease in 
capital investment as "a basic reason" for its negative growth 
forecast. 

   The 18 December YOMIURI article notes that even the "most 
optimistic" forecast is only a 1.6 percent real growth rate 
predicted by the Research Institute on the National Economy (RINE), 
followed by growth estimates of 1.4 percent by the Sumitomo Life 
Insurance Research Institute and 1.2 percent by the Nippon Credit 
Bank. 

   Government's Outlook of 2.5 Percent Growth Rate - According to 
the 3O December NIKKEI, the Ministry of Finance (MOF), the Ministry 
of International Trade and Industry (MITI), and the Economic 
Planning Agency (EPA) "will probably agree" on an outlook for a 2.5 
percent growth rate.  The three will start negotiating from mid- 
January on the government's growth outlook for FY94.  Unlike the 
forecasts of private institutions, which reflect actual economic 
conditions, the government's outlook is a "target."  The article 
notes that the MOF wants to set the outlook for real and nominal GDP 
growth rates "at over 2.5 percent and S.O percent respectively." 
The higher the outlook, the higher the estimate for tax revenues the 
MOF can use in compiling a FY94 budget draft.  High estimates will 
allow the MOF to avoid issuing deficit financing bonds.  Moreover, 
the article notes, the MOF is thinking of a scenario that would set 
an outlook of over 2.5 percent for the real growth rate in FY94 and 
more than 3 percent in FY95.  This would pave the way for a 
consumption tax increase the MOF plans to implement from FY95.  The 
article adds that MITI will concur with the MOF's desire for higher 
projections. 

   EPA economists, on the other hand, are determined to resist a 
higher outlook to "defend their credibility as economists," 
according to the 30 December NIKKEI.  The EPA, which was "forced" by 
the MOF and MITI to agree on the "excessively high" 3.3 percent 
growth outlook for FY93, hopes to avoid such an occurrence this 
year.  The EPA's reasons for opposing a higher outlook include the 
average forecast of 0.6 percent made by private research 
organizations and the EPA's own econometric simulations, which 
project a growth rate of "under 1 percent."  The EPA asserts that 
even if additional public investment and income tax cuts are 
implemented, the real growth rate "would barely reach 2 percent." 
If the MOF insists on an outlook higher than the 2 percent, the 
article notes, the EPA is determined to press the MOF for an income 
tax cut larger than the MOF anticipates and for "aggressive" 
government spending. 

   Japan Economic Research Center's Detailed Forecast - The 21 
December NIKKEI carries a detailed forecast compiled by the Japan 
Economic Research Center (JERC), NIKKEI's research arm.  The JERC 
predicts a 0.3 percent real GDP growth rate, assuming a 5 trillion 
yen ($48 billion) income tax cut, 2 trillion yen ($19 billion) in 
additional public investment, and a stable 1.75 percent ODR 
throughout FY94.  It also estimates an average crude oil price of 
$19 per barrel and an exchange rate of 105.47 yen to the dollar 
throughout FY94. 

   The JERC expects growth to be driven by domestic demand in FY94. 
It predicts that domestic demand will increase real GDP by 0.4 
percent, while external demand "will decrease real GDP by 0.1 
percent."  Although nominal wages are expected to increase only by 
1.1 percent, household disposable income will increase by a larger 
percentage thanks to an income tax cut, which will stimulate real 
personal consumption to increase by 1.4 percent.  Housing investment 
will also increase 3 percent thanks to low interest rates. 
According to the JERC, capital investment will start increasing in 
the July-September 1994 quarter, resulting in only a 2.9 percent 
decrease in FY94 compared to the 8 percent decrease in FY93.  Public 
investment will increase by a slight O.3 percent because the FY93 
level is already high. 

   According to the JERC, exports will increase 2.8 percent as the 
exchange rate levels off.  Imports will increase 3.8 percent due to 
the strong yen.  Despite a decreasing trade surplus, the JERC 
expects Japan's current surplus for FY94 to increase to $139.2 
billion, a slight increase from FY93's estimated total of $135 
billion, at an exchange rate of 105.47 yen per dollar.  The reason 
for the slight increase is that while the trade surplus is 
decreasing, the surplus in Japan's transfer account is increasing as 
dividends received from overseas investment increase and interest 
payments made by Japanese banks to foreign banks decrease. 

   NIKKEI Critical of Economists - In an article in the 28 December 
NIKKEI, editorial staff writer Tadahiro Okada criticizes government 
economists for misjudging business conditions and making wrong 
economic forecasts.  Okada is critical of their "mistaken forecasts 
and misjudgments," which, in his view have led the government to 
delay taking appropriate actions the past three years.  According to 
Okada, the government's economic growth outlooks for FY92 and FY93 
were 3.5 percent and 3.3 percent, while the actual figure for FY92 
was 0.7 percent and the figure for FY93 will be minus 0.2 percent. 
Although the previous business cycle actually peaked in April 1991, 
Okada continues, the EPA held on to its view until early 1992 that 
the business cycle was still on a gradual upward trend.  Okada adds 
that the EPA also overestimated the effects of the past three 
economic stimulus packages. 

   Okada also criticizes private economists for being "overly 
optimistic" in their FY93 forecasts.  Most of 53 research 
organizations that made forecasts predicted a growth rate of over 
2.0 percent for FY93, including eight that predicted a growth rate 
exceeding 3.0 percent.  Okada further notes that most organizations 
predicted an exchange rate of around 120 yen to the dollar, when 
sufficient indications" existed that the yen would rise, such as 
Japan's large current surplus and decreasing outflow of long-term 
capital.  Okada concludes his article by urging all economists to 
"reflect and improve their forecasts" by competing each other. 

   FEATURE:  MITI Council's Report on Capital Investment Trends - 
SUMMARY:  A report submitted by the Industrial Structural Council 
warns that the current trend of decreasing research and development 
(R&amp;D) investment as well as lower spending on new product 
development will hinder the restructuring of Japan's industries.  It 
projects a 3.5 percent overall decrease in capital investment in 
FY93 and a 0.1 percent decrease in FY94.  The report also states 
that Japanese companies are shifting their investment from the 
United States and the European Community (EC) to Asia to regain cost 
competitiveness. 

   According to the 2 December issue of TSUSANSHO KOHO (MITI 
BULLETIN), the Industrial Finance Subcommittee of the Industrial 
Structural Council, which is under the Ministry of International 
Trade and Industry (MITI), submitted a report on FY93 private 
capital investment plans to the MITI minister on 26 November.  The 
report warns that the current trend of decreasing R&amp;D investment and 

spending on new product development will hinder the restructuring of 
Japan's industries over the medium and long term.  According to the 
report, in FY93 manufacturing R&amp;D investment will decrease by 19.9 
percent and spending on new product development by 15.6 percent. 
Given these developments, it warns that Japanese companies "will 
have difficulty creating new businesses and new products in the 
future. 

   The report points out that although companies have been 
restructuring to cope with current sluggish business conditions, 
their restructuring appears to concentrate on eliminating 
unprofitable businesses and making existing production procedures 
more efficient.  While it acknowledges that such corporate efforts 
are important, the report warns that this sort of restructuring will 
not help companies survive over the medium and long term.  It 
recommends that restructuring be "offensive" and include "continuous 
R&amp;D investment," through which higher value-added products and new 
businesses will be developed in areas where Japan has a comparative 
advantage.  To make it easier for companies to procure funds for 
such investment, the report recommends deregulation of the corporate 
bond and commercial paper markets. 

   According to the report, private capital investment planned for 
FY93 will decrease by 3.5 percent from FY92's level, for the third 
consecutive yearly decline.  In the manufacturing sector, capital 
investment will decrease 15.1 percent; basic materials industries 
will decrease their capital investment by 15.7 percent and the 
processing and assembly industries by 14.6 percent.  As for the 
nonmanufacturing sector, capital investment will increase by 4.8 
percent, thanks to a large 9.3 percent increase by the electric 
power industry. 

   Analysis of FY93 Overseas Direct Investment Plan - According to 
the report, overseas direct investment planned by Japanese 
corporations in FY93 will decrease by 28.1 percent, the third 
consecutive yearly decline.  Overseas investment by the 
manufacturing sector will decrease by 24.2 percent, because the 
automobile and electronic industries have completed their "initial 
large-scale investment projects."  Investment by the 
nonmanufacturing sector will drop 45.2 percent, primarily because of 
large decreases in investment in the EC and Asia by retailers and 
wholesalers. 

   By area, the nonmanufacturing sector will decrease direct 
investment across the board, while the manufacturing sector will 
decrease its investment in the United States by 41.3 percent and the 
EC by 10.6 percent, but will increase investment in Asia by 61.1 
percent.  The report concludes that Japanese corporations are 
shifting their direct investment from the United States and the EC 
to Asia, where further economic growth is expected, and which can 
enhance the cost competitiveness of Japanese companies. 

   The report points out that Japanese companies are making direct 
investments to regain cost competitiveness in the face of a strong 
yen, rather than to avoid trade friction.  The electronics industry, 
in particular, will focus on China as its future investment 
location. 

   Concerning FY94, according to the report, total capital 
investment planned by Japanese companies will decrease by 0.1 
percent compared to FY93.  Manufacturing sector investment will 
continue decreasing by 10.2 percent--basic material industries will 
decrease by 12.6 percent and processing and assembly industries by 
7.3 percent.  However, investment in the nonmanufacturing sector 
will increase by 3.6 percent. 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Hyogo Bank Still in Critical 
Condition Despite MOF Support -- SUMMARY:  The largest of Japan's 
second-tier regional banks, Hyogo Bank, is requesting further 
interest rate reductions from creditor financial institutions on 
behalf of its affiliated nonbanks, according to Japanese press 
reports.  Only one year has passed since Hyogo's restructuring plans 
were devised in December 1992, but already pressure is mounting to 
revise them. 

   The 31 December NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reports that Hyogo Bank 
announced on 30 December its request for an expansion of the 
interest rate reduction and remission policy to all 10 of its 
nonbank affiliates.  Currently, only three affiliates are granted 
the reduction and remission policy.  It also requested an extension 
of the period of "assistance" granted them from the original three 
to 10 years. 

   Specifically, Hyogo asked banks and insurance companies to 
decrease the interest they charge on loans to the nonbanks, 
currently between 3.25 and 5.5 percent, to the official discount 
rate (1.75 percent).  Hyogo also asked the financial institutions 
affiliated with the Central Bank for Agriculture and Forestry, 
nonbanks, and credit unions to decrease the interest rates they 
charge, currently between 4.75 and 5.5 percent, to the current long- 
term prime rate (3.5 percent).  The article states that these 
measures are expected to reduce the amount of interest the 10 
affiliated nonbanks pay annually from the current 64.5 billion yen 
($586.4 million) to 40 billion yen ($363.6 million). 

   MOF's Intervention - The January 1993 SENTAKU reported that after 
being audited by the Ministry of Finance (MOF) in the fall of 1992, 
Hyogo Bank stopped paying dividends.  Its chairman at the time, Hiro 
Hasegawa, resigned in October 1992 and Minoru Yamada, former 
councilor in the Minister's Secretariat at MOF, was installed as 
president.  Katsuhiko Oura, former head of the Bank of Japan (BOJ) 
Sendai Branch, and Kunihiko Otsubo, former loan examiner in the MOF 
Banking Bureau, were dispatched as consultants.  Subsequently, Oura 
was appointed vice president and Otsubo senior managing director, 
according to the 29 June ZAIKAI.  The last MOF "old boy" to be sent 
to Hyogo was the former Banking Bureau Director General, Masateru 
Yoshida, who was installed as president in June 1993, according to 
the 5 November NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN (NIKKEI KINYU).  In addition, it 
was disclosed in December 1992, according to the SENTAKU article, 
that 100 billion yen ($9.09 billion) in assistance loans were 
extended to Hyogo by BOJ, Sumitomo Bank, Industrial Bank of Japan, 
and Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan. 

   Council Established to Facilitate Consolidations - In order to 
ascertain the status of recovery of nonperforming assets and to 
further study restructuring plans, Hyogo Bank has established a 
"business management council" for each of its nonbanks, according to 
the 28 December NIKKEI KINYU.  The council consists of four to five 
Hyogo Bank officials, including Vice President Oura, and the 
presidents and officers in charge of asset recovery at each of the 
nonbanks.  The nonbanks will convene their conferences quarterly so 
they can work together with Hyogo Bank in asset recovery and 
consolidation.  A Hyogo Bank officer says that the conferences will 
enhance understanding about the real status of nonperforming 
assets."  Ascertaining "the real status of nonperforming assets" has 
been difficult in the past because collateral claims on them are 
complicated.  The council is expected to facilitate the 
consolidation of the nonbanks into viable affiliates. 

   Hyogo Still in Critical Condition - A 20 December NIKKEI KINYU 
article reports that while the "consolidation" idea gathered 
momentum in Hyogo Bank's initial restructuring plans a year ago, 
"there is no advantage to consolidation when assets are not being 
recovered as Hyogo wished."  The article reports that 1.69 percent 
of loans receivable as of the end of September 1993 were to bankrupt 
firms alone and that the amount of credit extended to bankrupt firms 
continues to rise.  It goes on to report that while it may seem that 
the "troika" formed by President Yoshida, Vice President Oura, and 
Senior Managing Director Otsubo is working, if one looks at the 
indicators of the Bank's performance, the situation is still 
critical. 

   Some "indicators" the article reports are as follows.  The rate 
of return on loans during the first half of FY93 was the lowest of 
the regional banks in the Kansai area (5.17 percent).  The deposit- 
loan margin of profit dropped 0.98 percentage points compared to 
FY92.  The overall profit margin has also dropped 0.26 percentage 
points.  Furthermore, while net business profits during the first 
half of FY93 were greater than expected, that was because of expense 
cuts.  About half of the 1.8 billion yen in decreased expenses 
during the first half of FY93 was due to payroll cuts.  New hiring 
ceased in FY93; executive bonuses were zero; employee bonuses were 
cut and the rate of pay increases was nearly zero. 

   In addition, 27 branch offices had been sold to affiliated 
companies as of the FY92 financial statements and 18 domestic and 
foreign branch offices are scheduled to undergo consolidation in 
FY93.  Hyogo had intended to sell its headquarters building by the 
end of March 1994, but the market value is reported to be between 3 
and 4 billion yen, much lower than the book value, 10.7 billion yen. 
At that price, the article reports, "the building cannot be sold." 

   There were rumors of a "salvage merger" with Sumitomo Bank, which 
holds 4.99 percent of Hyogo's stock according to the SENTAKU 
article.  But in the 20 December NIKKEI article, the head of 
Sumitomo is quoted as saying, "everything Sumitomo has is going into 
its own restructuring; there is no way it could dispatch personnel 
to Hyogo."  Moreover, President Yoshida is reported in the article 
as saying that he is not considering a merger with Sumitomo.  With 
its roots so deeply implanted in the region, a Hyogo merger would 
cause "the whole region to cave in." 

   Finally, the 20 December NIKKEI KINYU article reports that there 
is an alternative to such a merger, namely, writing off 
nonperforming assets of Hyogo and its nonbanks using public 
financing.  But it cautions that deep-rooted public opposition to 
this makes achieving a consensus difficult.  But without assistance 
one way or the other and an improvement in the business climate, the 
article cautions, Hyogo may be forced to "liquidate." 
   Foreign Trade and Investment - CENTRAL ASIAN REPUBLICS:  EBRD To 
Help Japanese Trading Companies Exploit Gold Resources -- The 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) will provide 
aid for gold refining projects that large Japanese trading companies 
are planning in the former Soviet Central Asian Republics.  Large 
trading companies like Mitsui &amp; Co. and Itochu Corp. are proceeding 

with gold refining and mining projects in three former Soviet 
Republics, Uzbekistan, Kyrgyzstan, and Kazakhstan, which altogether 
contain nearly 1O percent of the world's estimated gold deposits. 
The EBRD has decided to provide assistance in such projects and will 
organize a public-private cooperative to finance them in the spring 
of 1994.  The loan amounts for each of the gold projects are 
expected to be between $100 and $200 million. 

   In addition, because Japanese corporations will participate in 
the mining and refining projects, the EBRD expects syndication of 
the loans for the project to involve Japanese banks as well.  It 
intends to request their participation in loan syndication.  Each 
bank's loan is expected to be around $5 million. 

   Japanese banks are not reversing their cautious stance toward 
financing to Russia.  However, as the EBRD implements a financing 
effort in which  both public and private enterprises cooperate and 
that focuses on the Central Asian Republics, not on Russia, it hopes 
to stimulate renewed financing by Japanese banks in all areas of the 
former Soviet Union, including Russia.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
25 Dec 93 p 2) 

   RUSSIA:  Hosokawa Micron To Supply Environmental Equipment to 
Smelter - Hosokawa Micron, the world's leading manufacturer of 
particle processing equipment, has signed a 1 billion yen ($8.9 
million) contract with a Finnish agency to export environmental 
equipment to a Russian aluminum smelter in Kandalaksha, near the 
border between Finland and Russia.  The equipment reclaims fluoride 
from the refinery's exhaust emissions and reprocesses it for reuse 
in the aluminum refining process.  Hosokawa Micron's German 
subsidiary developed the equipment and is marketing it in Canada and 
Western Europe.  This will be the first emissions-reprocessing 
equipment to be installed in Russia.  The company views Russia and 
Eastern Europe as promising markets. 

   Also, beginning in January 1994, Hosokawa Micron will establish a 
500 million yen ($4.4 million) facility for recycling electric power 
and telephone cables.  The equipment for this facility, which breaks 
up the cable and extracts the original vinyl, aluminum, and copper 
for reuse, was developed by a German company that Hosokawa acquired 
in 1987.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 23 Dec 93 p 10) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  Shortages of Electronic Parts in Southeast Asia 
- Because of the rapid appreciation of the yen, Japanese 
manufacturers of home electronics products have been moving their 
production bases to Southeast Asia.  As a result, the demand for 
locally procured parts has grown, causing shortages and price 
increases.  According to sources from the Japanese semiconductor 
industry, which has moved into Southeast Asia, the amount of orders 
received in Southeast Asia for semiconductors and electronic parts 
exceeds last year's by 30 to 40 percent.  A private research agency 
forecasts that the semiconductor market in Asia, excluding Japan, 
will be 18 percent of the total world market and be worth about 
$14.3 billion for 1993. 

   Currently, in Southeast Asia there is a severe shortage of 4- 
megabit dynamic random-access memory chips, which are used in 
personal computers.  This has led to a purchase price of around $14 
per chip, 11.3 percent higher than the second quarter of 1992, and 
17 percent higher than the current price in Japan.  Mitsubishi 
Electric Corp.'s Singapore branch is reported to be "unable to meet 
demand."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 15 Dec 93 p 26) 

   Tsubakimoto Opens Office in Thailand - Tsubakimoto Machinery and 
Engineering Co., Ltd. will open an office in Bangkok, Thailand in 
January 1994.  Thailand has a favorable economic environment with a 
high growth rate, and Japanese companies are continuing to expand 
into Thailand as a production base.  Tsubakimoto plans to supply all 
the machine parts these Japanese subsidiaries may need.  The local 
office, managed by one Japanese and two Thais, will scout out local 
manufacturers who can supply parts; investigate the local market; 
and provide sales, delivery, and service for parts made for 
Thailand. 

   This will be Tsubakimoto's third overseas location, following 
Seoul and Singapore.  In the future, Tsubakimoto is planning to 
strengthen its overseas development, concentrating on Asia.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 7 Dec 93 p 14) 

   VIETNAM:  Japanese Business Mission Goes to Vietnam - The Tohoku 
Productivity Center, the Tohoku Industrial Engineering (IE) 
Association, and the Miyagi Industrial Association are sponsoring an 
economic exchange mission to Vietnam from 20-27 February 1994.  The 
title of the mission will be "Vietnam Economic Exchange Mission." 
Participants will be executives of 15 to 20 of Tohoku's leading 
enterprises, particularly those dealing with energy and electrical 
machinery.  Masanori Kogo, chair of the Tohoku IE Association and an 
advisor to Tokin Corp., will lead the mission. 

   The goal of the mission is to generate economic exchange through 
on-the-spot observation and consultations.  Participants will 
observe economic and industrial trends, and the investment 
environment under Vietnam's "Doi Moi" renovation policy.  They will 
also check current conditions in Vietnam's special economic zones. 
Locations to be visited include Haiphong's Hon Gai coal mine, which 
produces very high quality coal, an industrial park in Ho Chi Minh 
City, and the cities of Hanoi and Ha Dong.  Consultations with VIPs 
from the State Economic Commission, the State Commission for 
Cooperation and Investment, the Electric Power Supply Public 
Corporation, and the state-operated Petroleum Export Public 
Corporation are planned.  In addition, the mission will meet with 
executives of Japanese enterprises that are already established in 
Vietnam. 

   The Tohoku Productivity Center has previously sponsored missions 
to Thailand and Indonesia, but this is the first it has sponsored to 
Vietnam.  According to the Productivity Center, "In Vietnam, on top 
of low labor costs, the educational level is high, and petroleum, 
natural gas and other resources are plentiful.  During this period 
when the shift to overseas factories is progressing, it makes sense 
to promote exchange."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 4 Dec 93 p 24) 

   Japan-U.S. Economic Relations - FEATURE:  U.S. Officials 
Criticize Japan's Economic Bureaucrats -- SUMMARY:  Reported 
criticism of Japanese bureaucrats by senior U.S. Government 
officials has "aggravated" the atmosphere in the framework talks 
between the two nations, according to press reports.  One paper 
asserts that U.S. Ambassador Mondale has tried to "ease" U.S. 
positions in the talks so that the February meeting between 
President Clinton and Prime Minister Hosokawa will be successful. 

   The 25 December NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reports that recent 
criticism of Japanese bureaucrats allegedly made by "high-ranking 
White House officials" has caused "friction" between the two 
countries.  U.S. Trade Representative Mickey Kantor and Deputy 
Assistant to the President for Economic Affairs Bowman Cutter have 
"openly criticized" Japanese bureaucrats on two key points, 
according to NIKKEI.  The first is that Japanese bureaucrats have 
"fostered erroneous impressions" in the minds of Japanese Government 
leaders and the Japanese public by relaying  "distorted" versions of 
U.S. proposals put forth during the framework talks.  Second, they 
have criticized Japanese bureaucrats for "preventing" Japan from 
moving ahead with market opening measures, deregulation, and income 
tax reduction measures, NIKKEI reports. 

   The 26 December ASAHI SHIMBUN asserts that at a 23 December 
briefing for foreign journalists, Deputy Assistant to the President 
for Economic Affairs Bowman Cutter stated that "Japanese bureaucrats 
tend to represent the best interests of their ministries rather than 
the views of the prime minister."  According to ASAHI, he stated 
that Japanese bureaucrats have a "higher status" in the current 
U.S.-Japan talks because Prime Minister Hosokawa is "absorbed" with 
the political reform issue.  He reportedly described Japanese 
bureaucrats as "obstacles" because "they have always functioned in 
the same way and cannot keep pace with rapid changes occurring in 
the outside world."  According to the paper, he also criticized 
unnamed bureaucrats for "convincing" the Japanese public that the 
United States, as part of its efforts to introduce "objective 
criteria for trade" is demanding "market share" to open up Japan's 
markets.  He also reportedly stressed that the U.S. side "has never 
once asked for import targets," ASAHI notes. 

   NIKKEI on Reasons for U.S. Criticism - The 25 December NIKKEI 
asserts that "general irritation" over the "difficult" pace of the 
U.S.-Japan framework talks has led to open criticism by U.S. 
officials.  According to the paper, American officials may also have 
been "upset" by what they viewed as international support for 
Japanese allegations that the United States is seeking market shares 
and  managed trade."  These allegations, according to NIKKEI, are 
not necessarily distorted," because initially the Clinton 
administration "repeatedly made statements about adhering to market 
share objectives."  NIKKEI also observes that "remarks by Japanese 
bureaucrats" urging the United States to soften its position toward 
Japan may have "rubbed U.S. officials the wrong way." 

   NIKKEI concludes that the U.S. side has recently "revised" its 
position but that it has been "extremely" concerned that this would 
be interpreted as "caving in to Japan" and would be criticized by 
the U.S. Congress.  Consequently, the U.S. side, recognizing it had 
already scored "minus points" in the framework talks, "went ahead 
anyway" with its public criticism of Japanese bureaucrats, according 
to NIKKEI. 

   Mondale Credited for Shift in U.S. Position - Since mid-December, 
according to the 23 December NIKKEI, the Clinton administration's 
position on Japan has shifted to one which is more acceptable to 
Japan.  NIKKEI asserts, the United States has "relaxed" its position 
by claiming that it will not pursue "market-share objectives" and 
that it "wants to reach an agreement to guide Japan toward opening 
its markets to similar levels of accessibility as the markets of 
other advanced countries," NIKKEI reports. 

   The U.S. position has become more "workable" because of the 
counsel provided by U.S. Ambassador Walter Mondale, according to 
NIKKEI.  "According to several White House officials," Ambassador 
Mondale has been communicating with U.S. officials via telephone and 
cables as well as talking with them during their visits to Japan. 
He has reportedly stressed that "the U.S. side must take into 
consideration the severe circumstances facing Prime Minister 
Hosokawa if they want the U.S.-Japan talks scheduled for February to 
be successful." 

   NIKKEI traces the beginning of the shift in the U.S. position to 
early December, when Deputy Treasury Secretary Roger Altman visited 
Japan.  At that time, while U.S. officials were meeting with the 
Japanese side in Tokyo, Altman was briefed on Japan's political and 
economic conditions by Ambassador Mondale, who reportedly tried to 
convey the message that "you cannot just attack" the Japanese side 
in attempting to solve issues. 

   NIKKEI notes that President Clinton has "batted in three 
consecutive runs" with the NAFTA treaty, the APEC conference in 
Seattle, and the GATT treaty negotiations.  U.S. Trade 
Representative Kantor is "determined" that the U.S.-Japan economic 
talks succeed so that the United States will be able to secure yet 
another advance in its economic diplomacy.  The question remains, 
NIKKEI observes, how the Japanese Government will address the U.S. 
position, which now is more "workable" as a result of the efforts of 
Ambassador Mondale and other U.S. officials who are "eager to 
score." 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  Machine Tool Companies 
Continue Retrenchment Steps -- SUMMARY:  The prolonged slump in 
Japan's machine tool industry is forcing companies to continue their 
retrenchment efforts.  Various firms are attempting to cut costs by 
scaling back on outsourcing, furloughing workers, and pushing 
through the "voluntary" retirement of workers. 

   Mori Seiki--According to the 24 December NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, 
Mori Seiki, a major machine tool (MT) manufacturer, will stop 
contracting out MT parts production at the end of December and 
concentrate this work in-house at its plants in Iga, Mie Prefecture. 
The company notified approximately 25 parts processing 
subcontractors in Osaka, Nara, and Mie Prefecture in mid-November 
that they would no longer receive work.  The volume of work involved 
was not indicated, but Mori Seiki's president stated that "the total 
amount saved will be equal to the personnel expenses of 150 
workers." Mori Seiki has been dealing with some of these 
subcontractors since the firm was founded.  "They are just like 
family," Mori's president stated, "but we must give work to our own 
workers first."  NIKKEI SANGYO observes:  "This move, whereby it 
must cut off its subcontractors to protect its own workers, reveals 
the seriousness of the situation." 

   In the spring of 1993 Mori Seiki completed construction of a 
second plant in Iga which incorporated the latest automated 
production lines, NIKKEI SANGYO notes.  But because of the sales 
slump its utilization rate was only about 50 percent.  Therefore, 
production will be moved from Mori Seiki's Nara plant and 
concentrated at Iga by the summer of 1994, except for special- 
purpose machine tools. 

   Takamatsu Machine Industry--The 3 December NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI) reports that Takamatsu Machine Industry (TMI), a 
manufacturer of computer numerically controlled (CNC) lathes, has 
begun lowering its manufacturing costs by cutting back on the 
outsourcing of parts processing and product design, standardizing 
parts, reducing its product line, and furloughing workers.  TMI will 
reassign the rough processing of metal parts to workers at its 
headquarters plant, whose lathe and machining-center assembly work 
was reduced by the slump in sales.  TMI hopes to achieve 2 million 
yen ($18,200) per month in cost reductions this year through these 
moves. 

   TMI's technical development department will assume responsibility 
for the design of all precision parts for lathes and robots from the 
company's MT design office, NIKKEI adds.  In the first half of FY93 
the MT design office contracted out about 4 million yen ($36,400) in 
design work each month.  This will be completely eliminated under 
the new policy.  TMI also decided to furlough workers in the 
production department for two days in December. 

   Okuma--The labor union at Okuma, a major MT manufacturer, has 
agreed to a proposal made by the company for the "voluntary" 
retirement of 380 out of Okuma's 2,200 workers early next year, 
according to the 26 December CHUNICHI SHIMBUN.  The proposal, 
accepted by the union at an emergency meeting held on 25 December, 
calls for an increase in the maximum special bonus from the 
equivalent of 20-months' pay to 24 months in addition to regular 
retirement allowances; an increase in next summer's bonus from the 
equivalent of 1.3-month's wages to 1.5 month's; only the regularly 
scheduled pay raise will be implemented; and the union will not call 
for an increase in base pay during the "spring labor offensive." 

   Toyoda Machine Works--According to the 25 December NIKKEI SANGYO, 
Toyoda Machine Works (TMW) will furlough workers in its MT 
production divisions for six days between January and March 1994. 
Of the 2,500 workers at TMW's main plant and East Kariya plant, both 
located in Kariya City, Aichi Prefecture, about 1,300 in the MT and 
mechatronics production divisions will be affected.  During that 
time TMW will receive a government employment adjustment subsidy. 
The furloughed workers will be on standby status at home and will be 
paid 85 percent of their regular salary.  TMW, after Aichi Steel 
Works, is the second company in the Toyota Group to implement 
furloughs. 

   Nippei Toyama--According to the 18 December NIKKEI, Nippei 
Toyama, a MT manufacturer specializing in transfer machines, will 
furlough 340 workers at its Fujiyama plant in Fukuno-cho, Fujiyama 
Prefecture, and 158 workers at its Yokohama plant for an average of 
10 days between 16 December and the middle of February.  During four 
of the 10 days all plant operations will be halted.  By furloughing 
workers, Nippei expects to reduce personnel costs at the two plants 
by 30 to 40 million yen ($273,000-$364,000).  Also, the company will 
not hire any new workers this spring.  Nippei anticipates its 
current losses for FY93 will be about 3.6 billion yen ($32.7 
million), an increase of about 3 billion yen ($27.3 million) from 
FY92. 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  Articles Assess 
Foreign Semiconductor Market Share Issue -- SUMMARY:  According to 
press reports, the reaction by Japan's semiconductor industry to the 
announcement that the foreign share of Japanese semiconductor sales 
had dropped to 18.5 percent was that the drop was expected.  Reasons 
cited for the decline include the high demand in the United States 
for semiconductors and the effects of yen appreciation.  The foreign 
share might improve in the future with imports of semiconductor 
devices used in cellular telephones and other specialized 
semiconductors. 

   For the third successive quarter in a row the share of foreign 
semiconductors sold on the Japanese market has dropped, this time to 
18.5 percent, well below the 20 percent goal set in the 1991 U.S.- 
Japan Semiconductor Agreement, according to the 21 December NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Although the Ministry of International Trade and 
Industry (MITI) and the Electronic Industries Association of Japan 
(EIAJ) were "openly angry" when the Office of the U.S. Trade 
Representative (USTR) prematurely announced the figures, reaction 
within the semiconductor industry to the figures was that "they were 
to be expected."  The article cites several reasons for the drop. 
One is that the U.S. demand for chips used in personal computers has 
expanded, so that U.S.-made chips are going to U.S. consumers, which 
"makes them unavailable for Japanese companies to purchase." 

   According to the 28 December NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), 
another reason is that although sales of foreign-made semiconductors 
have increased, they have not increased enough to keep the foreign- 
share figure from falling.  The paper notes that according to the 
Foreign Semiconductor Users' Committee (UCOM) of the EIAJ, sales of 
foreign-made semiconductors were up 25 percent in the six-month 
period from April to September 1993 compared to 1992. 

   The 29 December NIKKEI reports that appreciation of the yen has 
also affected purchases.  Because the yen has gained strength 
against the dollar, the volume of chips sold to Japan can increase 
while the dollar value of sales remains the same or perhaps even 
decreases.  The paper also notes that certain types of technically 
advanced semiconductors, such as microprocessing units, which 
constitute a significant portion of semiconductor imports, have 
dropped 20 to 30 percent in price.  This may be why, according to 
the 28 December MAINICHI SHIMBUN, UCOM Chairman Yoshida reacted to 
USTR Mickey Kantor's request for an emergency meeting on 
semiconductors in January by stating: "It is regrettable that the 
third- quarter foreign semiconductor share figure did not reflect 
the [Japanese] users' actual purchases or efforts." 

   Although MITI agreed to the emergency meeting, because either 
side is permitted to call one under the 1991 Semiconductor 
Agreement, MITI has taken the stance that it will oppose any attempt 
to raise the foreign share of the Japanese semiconductor market or 
to establish new numerical targets, according to the 28 December 
NIKKEI. 

   The 21 December NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN observes that although the 
foreign share of the Japanese semiconductor market is not expected 
to suddenly revive, "there is hope for the future."  As demand for 
personal computers in the United States slows, the semiconductors 
used in these computers "will become more available for sale in 
Japan."  The paper notes that imports of semiconductors used in 
telecommunications equipment will probably increase with the 
liberalization of the cellular telephone market in Japan and with 
increased exports of cellular phones to the United States.  Japanese 
imports of programmable logic devices, a specialized type of 
semiconductor, "are also expected to increase." 

   Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment Sales Up Sharply in October 
- Sales of Japanese-made semiconductor manufacturing equipment 
(SME), including exports, rose sharply in October by 41 percent over 
the same month last year to 24.7 billion yen ($225 million), 
according to statistics compiled by the Semiconductor Equipment 
Association of Japan (SEAJ).  This is the sixth consecutive monthly 
increase and the first time in over two and a half years that growth 
over 40 percent has been recorded.  [For previous reporting on SME 
sales, see the 21 April 1993 Pacific Rim Economic Review Vol 2, No 
8] 

   On a segmented basis, sales of domestically produced equipment 
used in the wafer processing stage of production--including steppers 
for which orders from the U.S. and South Korea have been strong- 
-grew by 52.9 percent to 15.3 billion yen ($139 million), accounting 
for over 60 percent of total sales.  Nikon and Canon, the two 
biggest stepper producers, are planning to operate their plants at 
full capacity until the middle of next year.  Overseas sales of 
assembly equipment used in the post-manufacturing process, such as 
bonding equipment, continued to strengthen, and total sales rose 
61.1 percent to 3.9 billion yen ($36 million). 

   The SEAJ also reports that total SME sales in Japan, including 
imported U.S.-made equipment, registered an increase for the first 
time in three months, rising 6.7 percent over October 1992 to 19.6 
billion yen ($178 million).  Japanese semiconductor producers are 
beginning to increase capital investments due to strong and 
sustained demand for advanced memory chips, but also in response to 
massive capital investments recently made by U.S. and Korean 
semiconductor makers such as Intel and Samsung.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 25 Dec 93 p 5) 

   U.S. Replaces Japan as Leader in Semiconductor Market Share - 
According to the 14 December YOMIURI SHIMBUN, for the first time in 
eight years the United States has replaced Japan as the leader in 
world semiconductor market share.  The paper, using information from 
the U.S. firm Dataquest, ranks the approximately 160 semiconductor 
companies in the world calculated on actual output for January 
through October 1993 and estimated results for November and 
December.  In 1993, it notes, the U.S. share of the world market was 
41.9 percent, barely exceeding Japan's 41.4 percent. 

   YOMIURI's ranking of the top ten companies are as follows: 

BOT 

Rank Company Name            Sales     Growth from 1992 World Share 
                            billion)    (percentage)    (percentage) 
 1   Intel (U.S.)               7.950        56            9.6 
 2   NEC (Japan)                6.173        27            7.4 
 3   Motorola (U.S.)            5.973        29            7.2 
 4   Toshiba (Japan)            5.754        23            6.9 
 5   Hitachi (Japan)            5.038        31            6.1 
 6   Texas Instruments (U.S.)   4.003        30            4.8 
 7   Samsung Electronics (ROK)  3.047        60            3.7 
 8   Fujitsu (Japan)            2.931        15            3.5 
 9   Mitsubishi Elec. (Japan)   2.804        27            3.4 
10   IBM (U.S.)                 2.510        --           -- 

EOT 

   According to the YOMIURI article, IBM replaced Japan's Matsushita 
Electric Works in tenth place, leaving Japan with only four 
companies in the top ten.  Also, Toshiba, Fujitsu, and Mitsubishi 
Electric all fell one position from 1992.  The 14 December MAINICHI 
SHIMBUN reports that 1993 was the first time a South Korean company 
has made the top ten list.  The 14 December ASAHI SHIMBUN also noted 
that non-Japanese Asian semiconductor companies attained a combined 
7.4 percent share of the world semiconductor market, "which reflects 
the increasing pressure they are putting on Japanese companies." 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - NEC Trial-Produces Digital Mobile 
Phone for U.S. Market -- NEC, a leading manufacturer of 
communications equipment, has trial-produced a digital mobile 
telephone that uses only one IC chip, in contrast to the two or 
three chips required in current telephones.  Using a simple 
algorithm, the mobile phone analyzes incoming signals and provides 
communications without "barriers," such as static interference.  The 
new telephone, which can also be produced in a miniature size, is 
designed to be compatible with U.S. communications systems, but can 
also be used in Japan with "minor alterations."  NEC will initially 
target the U.S. market in designing applications for the mobile 
telephone. 

   The algorithm is based on three applications.  First, the 
telephone is operable in a vehicle moving at high speeds because 
changes in the waveform of digital signals are predictable and 
traceable.  The new telephone can operate in a vehicle moving at a 
maximum speed of 100 km per hour.  Second, fluctuations in reception 
quality when used in a moving vehicle are lessened because the angle 
of the waveform and distance are used as polar coordinates to track 
the position of the waveform, making the signal traceable even when 
it fluctuates considerably.  Third, the static interference caused 
by signals echoing off high-rise buildings and mountains is reduced 
by staggering the timing for tracking signals to allow for a process 
in which all other signals received are compared to the initial 
signal.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 27 Dec 93 p 4) 

   NTT To Establish Specialized Office for Multimedia Activities - 
Nippon Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) has revealed that it will 
establish a "Multimedia Promotion Office" by merging existing 
corporate offices that currently oversee various aspects of its 
multimedia business activities.  NTT has not yet decided which units 
will be merged into the new office, which is scheduled to open in 
February 1994, but it is considering its Technology Studies Office, 
Imagery Communications Office, and Human Interface Research Center. 

   The new multimedia office will serve as NTT's "observation and 
command tower" for multimedia-related activities and will collect 
data on industry activities domestically and overseas, appraise the 
technical strengths of U.S. and Japanese manufacturers in the 
industry, and examine possible joint development projects.  NTT lags 
behind other Japanese and U.S. computer, electronics, and 
communications companies, which have formed strategic alliances in 
the multimedia service industry, and hopes to use the new office to 
link up with them.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 28 Dec 93 p 8) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Planned Overhaul of Corporations 
To Emulate Japanese Groupings -- A pilot project to convert about 55 
PRC conglomerates into Japanese-style corporations like Mitsubishi 
will be coordinated by the State Economic and Trade Commission 
(SETC), the State Planning Commission, and the State Commission for 
Economic Restructuring.  Most of the state enterprises participating 
are on the top 1,000 list.  The move is part of the overall reform 
strategy resulting from November's Third Plenary Session.  SETC 
Minister Wang Zhongyu reportedly dubbed it the "10,000-1,000-100-10 
Project" whereby 10,000 large and medium-sized state enterprises 
will be rejuvenated by the year 2000; of this 10,000, 1,000 will be 
chosen to test the concept of "supervisory boards," while 100 will 
undergo corporate restructuring, and 10 cities will be targeted for 
comprehensive reform of the state sector.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA 
MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) in English 30 Dec 93 p 1) Hong Kong 
Bureau 

   Shenzhen Company Involved in Record Equity Transfer Deal - The 
Shenzhen Investment Management Company, an investment arm of the 
Shenzhen Municipal Government, has signed an agreement to transfer 
58.5 million shares which it currently holds in three Shenzhen- 
listed companies to the China Ping An Insurance Company in exchange 
for 67.76 million shares in Ping An.  The transfer, which is worth 
406.5 million yuan, will make the Shenzhen Investment Management 
Company one of the top five shareholders in Ping An.  This is the 
largest equity transfer deal ever in China.  The 58.5 million shares 
comprise 36 million in the real estate developer Shenzhen Wuye 
Development (Group) Co. Ltd., 15 million in the Shenzhen 
Petrochemical (Group) Co. Ltd., and 7.5 million shares in the 
Shenbao Industry Co. Ltd.  After the purchase, Ping An will have a 
10.45 percent stake in Wuye, a 7.71 percent stake in Shenzhen 
Petrochemical and a 6.35 percent stake in Shenbao.  (Beijing CEI 
Database 4 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   First VCR Plant Begins Production in Dalian - The country's first 
manufacturer of key video cassette recorder (VCR) components 
formally began production in Dalian City, Liaoning Province, on 28 
December.  The China Hualu Electric Ltd, a shareholding company with 
investment from 10 assembly factories, formed a joint venture with 
Japan's Matsushita Electronics Industries last month.  The Japanese 
partner will invest about $81 million in the Hualu plant which cost 
$277 million to set up.  The plant will use the most advanced 
Matsushita technology and equipment to produce up to 1.8 million 
sets of key VCR components annually. The annual output value is 
expected to be $155 million, generating pretax profits of $26 
million.  The second phase of Hualu will soon be launched to push 
production capacity to 3 to 4 million sets annually by 1995. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY 29 Dec 93 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Zhejiang Is First Province To Have Complete Mobile Phone Network 
- Zhejiang has become the first province in China to have a complete 
mobile phone network.  The system serves over 60,000 users in the 
province's 74 counties and cities.  Tu Yonghe, deputy director of 
Zhejiang Posts and Telecommunications Administration, says the 
system capacity will be expanded to satisfy more clients and that 
any Hangzhou resident applying will have a phone installed by 1995. 
Hangzhou, with a population of 1.36 million, has a switchboard which 
can handle 189,200 lines, 131,000 of which have been hooked up. 
About 100,000 applicants have had phones installed this year and 
60,000 are still waiting.  Of the applicants, 60 percent are 
individuals while the rest are work units.  Tu said the province 
plans to expand telephone capacity to 3 million lines, add 20,000 
trunk lines, and build five post offices by the end of 1994. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY 23 Dec 93 p 3) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Barclays Bank Arranges $40-Million 
Telecommunications Loan -- In a deal brokered by Britain's Barclays 
Bank PLC, the Beijing International Trust and Investment Corporation 
(BITIC) will receive a loan of $40 million from a consortium of 10 
overseas financial firms to build a nationwide telecommunications 
network.  The other lenders are from Bahrain, South Korea, Italy, 
Singapore, Germany, and Austria.  In 1993, BITIC also secured a $25- 
million general purpose loan from Japan's Sumitomo Bank.  Since its 
establishment in 1984, BITIC has acquired loans of over $500 million 
for key construction projects in Beijing.  The telecommunications 
network will use advanced equipment from Motorola and will make use 
of an existing People's Liberation Army General Staff Headquarters 
communications network.  When the network is operational, users of 
cellular phones will have immediate access to information such as 
trading on the Shanghai Securities Exchange.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 
31 Dec 93 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Planned Sino-Indonesian Center To Boost Exports - China and 
Indonesia plan to build a trade center in Indonesia to boost exports 
from the mainland.  The center will become an ideal place to display 
and sell Chinese goods in Indonesia, said Probosutedjo, chairman of 
the Indonesia-China Advisory Committee of Industry and Commerce. 
Liu Shanzai, assistant minister of foreign trade and economic 
cooperation told Probosutedjo that China hopes the facility will 
improve the after-sales service for machinery and electronics 
products and that it will act as a base for expanding into Southeast 
Asia.  Probosutedjo said he wanted strengthened cooperation with 
China on the construction of power stations, hoping that China could 
provide power generating equipment and technology to help ease 
Indonesia's power shortages.  Liu said Indonesia favored Chinese 
power generating equipment because it is cheaper than that from 
developed countries and that China will try to export more 
equipment.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 23 Dec 93 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Qingdao Attracts Large Amounts of Asia-Pacific Investment - 
Qingdao, in Shandong Province, has become one of the main cities for 
absorbing investment from Asia-Pacific countries and regions. As of 
November 1993, a total of 2,147 enterprises receiving investments 
from Asia-Pacific countries and regions had been established in 
Qingdao, constituting 95 percent of the total number of foreign- 
funded enterprises in the city.  The investment value was $4.552 
billion, 93.5 percent of total foreign investment, and contracted 
foreign capital $2.908 making up 94.2 percent of the total 
contracted foreign capital.  The city has also obtained loans of 
$86.8 million and $103 million from the Asian Development Bank.  The 
top six Asia-Pacific investors are:  Hong Kong, Taiwan, the United 
States, South Korea, Japan, and Singapore.  The industries involved 
include the food processing, textiles and clothing, machinery 
processing, chemical industry, arts and crafts, plastics, and 
tertiary industries.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1108 GMT 23 Dec 
93) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Hong Kong Regains Position as World's Biggest Container Port - 
Extrapolated statistics show that Hong Kong will will handle a total 
of 9.3 million twenty foot equivalent units (TEU) in 1993, eclipsing 
Singapore, Rotterdam, and Kaohsiung to become the world's biggest 
container port.  Mainland China has made the biggest contribution to 
growth, with the value of goods transited via Hong Kong increasing 
by 33 percent from January to October this year.  Mainland China is 
Hong Kong's biggest transit market and 42 percent of its export 
commodities are shipped abroad via Hong Kong.  Hong Kong's efforts 
to constantly improve its port facilities and cargo-handling 
procedures have also contributed to the success in its shipping 
industry.  Operating procedures have been improved. For instance, 
all incoming and exiting trucks are now supervised and directed by 
computer as a result of the Port Authority's decision to automatize 
and computerize procedures.  This has reduced the time required to 
load and unload a container to less than one hour. 

   The container and shipping industry is very important to Hong 
Kong's economy.  The industry handles 90 percent of the territory's 
total cargo and contributes 15 percent of GDP, providing jobs to 
350,000 people.  In the last five years, Hong Kong's capacity has 
increased 15 percent annually, and its marine cargo is predicted to 
increase from 100 million tonnes per annum at present to 200 million 
tonnes by the turn of the century, increasing by a further 100 
percent by 2011.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1022 GMT 27 Dec 
93) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Hong Kong TV Maker Targets Mainland Market for Expansion - 
Consumer electronics group Kong Wah Holdings has entered into a 
joint venture with the Shannxi-based Caihong Electronic Group to 
exploit the color television market in China.  Kong Wah and Caihong 
will both hold 42.5 percent of the venture, the remainder being held 
by Zhuhai's Tong Fei company.  Kong Wah's initial investment would 
be HK$10 million.  Kong Wah Chairman CK Lam said that, as China's 
largest manufacturer of color picture tubes, Caihong Electronics 
would be able to stabilize the supply of picture tubes to Kong Wah. 
Mr. Lam said the company expected to invest a further HK$2O million 
in the project by the end of next year.  Kong Wah currently has 8 
percent of the mainland market for televisions, but Lam expects this 
to increase to 20 to 25 percent by the end of 1994.  (Hong Kong THE 
STANDARD 23 Dec 93 p 23) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Jiangsu Economic, Technological Development Zone Attracts 
Foreigners - Kunshan Economic and Technological Development Zone, 55 
km west of Shanghai in Jiangsu Province, has exerted great efforts 
to accelerate its economic development.  Some 19 overseas countries 
and regions, including the United States, Japan, Germany, South 
Korea, Singapore, Thailand, Hong Kong, and Taiwan have provided 
investment.  From 1989 to June 1993 the zone sold 91 parcels of land 
covering an area of 3.24 million square meters to foreign investors. 
By last September the zone had 250 enterprises of which the 164 from 
overseas had promised $600 million in investment.  During the past 
eight years the zone has created an industrial output value of $1.26 
billion generating $69 million in profits and taxes, while exports 
have totaled $350 million.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 
2-8 Jan 94 p 4) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan:  Finance Ministry To Remove More Limits on Financial 
Investment - The Ministry of Finance on 20 December decided to 
abolish the ban on investment in Taiwan's banking sector by overseas 
Chinese and foreigners and to cancel limits on the ratio of share 
ownership which overseas Chinese and foreigners are subject to when 
investing in securities firms, insurance companies, and futures 
trading houses in Taiwan.  To accelerate the development of Taipei 
into an Asia-Pacific financial center, the ministry has also decided 
to abolish limits on foreign cash flow.  According to the decision, 
foreign investors will be allowed to freely remit their capital 
funds and gains earned from investment in Taiwan.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 21 Dec 93 p 1) Okinawa Bureau 

   Economic Cooperation Agreement Signed With Turkey - The Chinese 
National Association of Industry and Commerce and the Turkish 
Association of Foreign Relations on 14 December concluded a 
cooperation agreement in Taipei.  The Republic of China and Turkey 
agreed to promote bilateral economic and trade contacts as well as 
exchanges of personnel and information.  They have also agreed to 
form a Chinese-Turkish Bilateral Commercial Committee and to 
establish the first channel of economic and trade cooperation 
between Taiwanese and Turkish industrial and commercial enterprises. 

   According to statistics by the Ministry of Economic Affairs, the 
volume of trade between Taiwan and Turkey totaled $390 million in 
1992, an increase of 45 percent over 1991.  In the first three 
quarters of this year, bilateral trade rose to $510 million. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 15 Dec 93 p 9) Okinawa Bureau 

   Foreign Investment in Stock Market Estimated To Quadruple in 1993 
- According to the Central Bank of China, more than $700 million in 
foreign capital poured into Taiwan's stock market in December as 
more foreign organizations have been granted approval to invest in 
Taiwan.  It is estimated that the amount of foreign capital invested 
in the stock market here will exceed $1.7 billion this year, four 
times the 1992 figure.  The Central Bank noted the continued inflow 
of foreign capital has caused the New Taiwan dollar to steadily 
appreciate against the U.S. dollar.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 17 
Dec 93 p 1) Okinawa Bureau 

   Exports to U.S., Hong Kong Outlined; Investment in PRC Climbs - 
By the end of November this year, the ratio of Taiwanese exports to 
Hong Kong rose to 21.7 percent, while the ratio of exports to the 
U.S. market dropped from last year's 28.9 percent to 27.6 percent. 
The Ministry of Economic Affairs has predicted that within the next 
three years, Hong Kong may replace the United States as Taiwan's 
largest export market.  Meanwhile, in the first eleven months of 
this year Taiwanese investments in the PRC totaled $1 billion, about 
five times last year's figure of $247 million.  From January to 
November, Taiwan's exports via Hong Kong exceeded $18.5 billion, 
representing an annual increase of 18.5 percent, earning Taiwan a 
trade surplus of $15.3 billion.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 21 Dec 93 
p 1) Okinawa Bureau 

   KMT-Run Enterprises Will Not Be Allowed To Invest in the PRC - At 
a 16 December meeting on Kuomintang-run enterprises, Party Secretary 
General Hsu Shui-te said party-run enterprises will definitely not 
be allowed to invest in the PRC.  Hsu made the remark in response to 
a suggestion that party-run enterprises should be allowed to invest 
in the PRC once Taiwan becomes a GATT member.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 20 Dec 93 p 1) Okinawa Bureau 

   GATT Membership To Impact on Automotive Regulations - Within two 
to three years after joining GATT, Taiwan will completely abolish 
the regulations requiring automobiles manufactured on the island to 
use a certain proportion of locally manufactured parts.  These 
regulations are still enforced to protect the local car industry. 
Meanwhile, Economic Minister Chiang Ping-kun said on 27 December 
that Taiwan will have to open its market to foreign cars after it 
becomes a GATT member, adding that the Republic of China will allow 
four to five years for the car industry to adjust before opening the 
market to foreign cars.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 28 Dec 93 p 2) 
Okinawa Bureau 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Russian Researcher Documents Decline of 
North Korean Economy - SUMMARY:  In a recent assessment of the North 
Korean economy, a Russian Academy of Sciences senior researcher, who 
had lived in North Korea from 1985 through 1991, concluded that the 
North Korean economy has been in serious decline for the past 15 
years. 

   Russian academician Svetlana Serapimovna Suslina, a specialist in 
North and South Korean industrial development, recently wrote that 
despite the limited nature of available North Korean economic data, 
there is enough evidence to document serious economic decline for 
the last 15 years.  The main economic characteristics of the l98Os 
and the l990s have been the shortages of resources, technologies, 
and energy, according to an article Suslina authored in the 11 
November 1993 issue of the South Korean weekly magazine, SISA 
JOURNAL.  In her article, Suslina estimated that industrial 
facilities are currently operating only at between 50-70 percent of 
capacity. 

   Suslina concluded that as economic problems have mounted, North 
Korea's leaders have realized the need for economic cooperation with 
the outside world.  However, with the decrease of raw materials 
imported from the former Soviet Union, joint ventures have been 
faced with serious obstacles.  She estimated that North Korea 
participates in about 200 joint venture companies within and outside 
the country. 

   Suslina outlined the following sketch of the status of North 
Korea's Third Seven-Year plan (1987-1993) as of 1992: 

   Electricity and Energy:  Suslina wrote that North Korea's most 
urgent task is to build hydroelectric power plants.  She said that 
originally Pyongyang had planned to build hydroelectric power plants 
in Daechong and Mt. Kumgang and a thermal power plant in Anju, along 
with two nuclear power plants.  However, according to Suslina, the 
Daechong hydroelectric power plant, which she described as 
potentially the biggest in the country, has been only partially 
completed, and construction work on the Kumgang and Anju power 
plants has not even begun.  She wrote that plans to build additional 
power plants in Namgang, Sopyongyang, Sibiwol, and Haeju have been 
postponed.  The total electricity output for 1992 was "31 billion 
kw/h." 

   Coal Production:  According to Suslina, much effort has been put 
into the expansion of mining facilities in Anju, Sunchon, Dukchon, 
Pukchong, and Kadong, but this attempt proved to be "hardly 
profitable."  She said that the regime had set the goal of producing 
120 million tons of coal per year, but that only 52 million tons 
were produced in 1992. 

   Steel Production:  Suslina wrote that despite the regime's high 
expectations, the Kim Chaek Iron Complex is operating only at one 
third of its total annual production capacity of 5 million tons 
because of shortages of coal and other materials.  She asserted that 
the North Koreans are planning to build a new iron foundry with a 2 
million ton capacity in the Chollima "Industrial Complex," but that 
the completion of the facility is far off.  The declared purpose for 
building the Chollima foundry is to produce 400,000 tons of aluminum 
per year and nonferrous metals for aluminum alloy.  According to 
Suslina, the DPRK planned to produce 1.7 million tons of nonferrous 
metals in 1992, but could only produce 300,000 tons.  She estimated 
total production of cast iron at 3.5 million tons, and iron and 
steel at 4 million tons. 

   Machinery:  According to Suslina, Pyongyang hopes to increase 
production by "2.5 times."  However, she said that the achievement 
of this goal has been hampered by shortages of metals, backward 
production techniques and other factors.  She reported that in 1992 
North Korea produced 20,000 pieces of agricultural equipment and 
15,000 trucks. 

   Agricultural and Marine Production:  Suslina wrote that the 
regime has set a "unrealistic" targets for grain production, 
including rice.  She estimated that total grain production for 1992 
was only 5.5 million tons, including 3 million tons of rice.  She 
opined that factors contributing to the low production figures 
include the lack of adequate irrigation and chemical fertilizer 
supplies, and inadequate mechanization because of fuel shortages. 
She wrote that production for 1993 would fall far short of the goal 
of 7.2 million tons, with actual production reaching only 3.5 
million tons.  For marine production, she said that the regime's 
1993 goal was 11 million tons, but that the actual production would 
reach only 3 million tons. 

   Light Industry:  Suslina wrote that poor conditions in heavy 
industry have also affected the country's light industry.  For 
example, total textile output for 1992 remained only at one third of 
the projected goal of 1.5 billion meters. 

   Housing:  In contrast to other industries, Suslina stated that 
housing construction in North Korea has been booming, particularly 
in Pyongyang, where, she observed, a marked increase of housing 
construction. 

   South Korea Sees DPRK's 1993 Economic Performance as Worst Ever - 
An official South Korean government year-end report on North Korea 
has concluded that the country's economy experienced its "worst 
crisis" in 1993 and would continue negative growth, which has been 
the trend since 1990.  The deterioration of the North's economy is 
attributed to energy and raw material shortages, as well as to 
country's socialist policies. 

   According to the 2 December issue of Seoul's NAEWOE PRESS, North 
Korea's limited economic accomplishments in 1993 centered around 
labor intensive basic industries like railroad construction, 
electrification of railways, housing construction, and clothing and 
textile factories.  North Korea also reportedly set up three joint- 
venture companies in cooperation with the General Association of 
Korean Residents in Japan (Chosen Soren) to produce graphite, 
medicines, and machinery.  The shortage of materials not only 
affected manufacturing but the construction field as well, with many 
construction projects remaining unfinished.  South Korea also 
estimated that the 1993 rice harvest would be down 30 percent from 
1992.  The following is a chronology of projects completed in North 
Korea in 1993.  (Seoul NAEWOE PRESS 2 Dec 93 pp C1-C4) 

BOT 

Date       Project                       Additional Details 

6 Jan.     Expansion of Kim Chaek        Construction begunin 1989 
           Polytechnical Institute       at order of Kim Chong-il; 
                                         15-story main building 

8 Jan.     Ground breaking for Sokdo     Floor space:  5,000 square 
           ice rink in Pyongyang         meters 

18 Jan.    Construction of large-scale 
           floating dock in Nampo 
           shipyard 

11 Feb.    Opening of electric railway   255.5 km 
           between Haesan and Manpo 

13 Feb.    Opening of electric railway    80 km 
           between Pyongsan and Kaesong 

4 Mar.     Opening of Yun I-sang Music    Floor space: 17,000 square 
           Hall in Pyongyang              meters 

3 Apr.     Opening of International Boys  Floor space: 15,O0O square 
           Camp in Songdowon in Wonsan    meters 
           City 

9 Apr.     Opening of Three Revolution    Floor space: 80,000 square 
           Exhibition Hall in Pyongyang   meters 

13  Apr.   Expansion of highway between   40 km 
           Pyongyang and Kangdong 

13  Apr.   Construction of March 4th      Annual production 
           Factory in North Pyongan       capacity: 
           Province                       150,000 pairs of rubber 
                                          shoes 

22  Apr.   Construction of Pukdaechon     360 m 
           suspension bridge 

28  Apr.   Completion of Scientists' Inn  800-room facility 
           in Pyongyang 

25 May     Construction of army-civilian  120 m 
           bridge in Daechon-ri, 
           Pyongyang 

1 Jun.     Opening of Myongshim Joint     Product--graphite; 
           Venture                        Chosen Soren joint venture 

11 Jun.    Construction of waterway       35 km 
           between Sohaegapmoon and 
           Ongjin 

21 Jun.    Construction of hot sauce      Floor space:  6,400 square 
           factory in Kaesong             meters 

Early Jul  Housing construction in        Construction begun in 
           Namsinuiju                     June,1988; 4,000 units 

Late Jul.  Housing construction in        Construction begun in May, 
           Pyongyang                      1992; 16,000 units in 
                                          Unification Road and 
                                          several thousands units in 
                                          Liberation Road 

Late Jul.  Third phase of Pyongyang       12 km between Saemaul Road 
           City electric streetcars       and Hasin Road 
           project 

25 Jul.    Opening of export clothing 
           factories in Daean, Yomju, 
           and Chungsan 

26 Jul.    Opening of export clothing 
           factory in Yonggang, South 
           Pyongan Province 

6 Aug.     Completion of boys camp        7-story building 
           in Hamhung City 

Late Aug.  Construction of electric       5.5 km 
           trolley line between Anju 
           and Sinanju 

Late Aug.  Construction of electric 
           railway between Yongkwang 
           and Sasu 

5 Sep.     Construction of railway        7.5 km 
           between Kowon and Purae 

Early Sep  Opening of Mankyongdae         Products--coats and dress 
           clothing factory in            suits 
           Pyongyang 

13 Sep.    Start-up operation of 
           Nanam Clothing Factory 
           in Chongjin 

7 Oct.     Completion of Pyongyang        Floor space:  33,000 
           cigarette paper factory        square meters 

7 Oct.     Construction of Aekuk          Funded by Chosen Soren 
           preventive medicine 
           manufacturing co. in 
           Pyongyang 

19 Oct.    Expansion of duck feather      Products--clothes and 
           processing factory in          blankets 
           Sunan, South Pyongan 
           Province 

19 Oct.    Expansion of export clothing 
           factory in Chongju, North 
           Pyongan Province 

20 Oct.    Start-up operation of          Products--combines, rice- 
           Kumkang Motor Joint Man-       planters, etc. 
           agement in Wonsan 

EOT 

   North Korea Claims Improved Method of Producing Riced Corn Flour 
- The maize processing research institute of North Korea's Academy 
of Light Industrial Sciences is claiming to have developed an 
improved method of producing riced corn flour.  The new riced corn 
flour is reportedly twice as sticky as that processed by the 
previous method and expands much like white rice.  The institute 
claims that it is currently producing three tons of riced corn flour 
per day and plans to introduce the new method nationwide.  Kim 
Chong-il reportedly congratulated the institute for its achievement. 
(Pyongyang MINJU CHOSON 12 Nov 93 p 1) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Press Calls for Environmental Awareness - 
SUMMARY:  The ROK press is calling on the South Korean government 
and the country's businesses to formulate a coherent response to 
advanced countries' attempts to develop international environmental 
management standards.  According to the press, the ROK response 
should include analyzing the proposed standards, adopting standards 
for the ROK, and encouraging firms to set up their own environmental 
standards.  The press also notes concerns that environment-related 
standards will become trade barriers as firms in polluting 
industries, which are numerous in, and key to, South Korea's 
economy, try to export to developed countries. The press is also 
voicing criticism that advanced countries intend the proposed 
standards to have just such an effect on trade. 

   The issue of international environmental management standards 
(IEMS) is becoming increasingly visible, according to the 1 December 
SILMUL KYONGJE.  The journal, published by the Korea Institute for 
Industrial Economics and Trade (KIET), notes that leading nations 
have been busily drawing up various regulations concerning 
environmental standards.  The fact that the United States and the EC 
are working actively to internationalize their own environmental 
standards, and that Japan is also actively promoting environmental 
inspection standards, should open up South Korea's eyes to the 
issue, SILMUL comments.  The 22 December CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports 
that the standards being discussed are tentatively called the ISO 
18000 series, on which the EC, in particular, is reportedly hard at 
work.  This series would assess, confirm, and certify the effects 
business activities have on the environment.  Unlike the ISO 
(International Standards Organization) 9000 series, which applies 
only to manufacturers, the 18000 series would apply to both the 
manufacturing and service industries and govern a full range of 
enterprise activities and products.  SILMUL notes that the standards 
would target everything from product R&amp;D to waste disposal, and that 

firms would have to follow strict procedures in producing goods or 
services without harming the environment in order to be awarded this 
certification. 

   According to SILMUL, the ROK government and ROK companies must 
realize the importance of this trend to develop IEMS, and should 
obtain and evaluate, as early as possible, advanced countries' 
environmental standards.  Some experts say that South Korea should 
adopt an IEMS certification system.  SILMUL explains that this would 
allow Korean-owned multinational corporations to have a single 
regulatory system, avoid duplicated certification or labelling 
procedures, and facilitate international transactions.  At the 
company level, firms should improve their abilities to measure the 
environmental impact of their operations and set up their own 
environment-related measures.  CHUGAN reports that the ISO formed an 
Environmental Technology Committee in February 1993 to develop a 
standards system.  In response, four ROK conglomerates and the 
Environmental Preservation Committee have formed five working-level 
teams to look at the issue as well.  Samsung Group's team is looking 
at environmental management and inspection, Hyundai's team will look 
at evaluating environmental efficiency, the Lucky-Goldstar team will 
analyze product life cycles, and Daewoo's team will work on 
environmental terminology and product standardization.  The 
Environmental Preservation Committee will look into the issue of 
environmental labelling.  In addition, all of the teams are tasked 
with looking at developing IEMS for South Korea. 

   While ROK press reports offer suggestions for adopting IEMS, they 
also note increasing concern that IEMS could be used as a new form 
of trade barrier.  According to SILMUL, if the standards drawn up by 
various countries are not brought into international "harmony," they 
may become barriers to international trade.  SILMUL points out that 
some ROK experts criticize moves to set up new international 
standards as attempts to erect "intellectual trade barriers" aimed 
at protecting domestic industries.  For example, if a "developing" 
country such as South Korea cannot obtain IEMS certification for a 
product, exports of this product to developed countries could be 
completely blocked.   These regulations would be applied extensively 
to industries that are heavy polluters, such as the petrochemical 
and software industries, and thus could be used as non-tariff 
barriers in these sectors. 

   CHUGAN is more blunt.  It states that the intent of advanced 
countries is to "set up technical trade barriers against 
underdeveloped countries."  Even the existing ISO 9000 series is 
gradually changing into a defensive tool used to attack products of 
underdeveloped countries and protect domestic industries, CHUGAN 
opines.  The journal notes that with the proposed ISO 18000, 
regardless of how good a product's quality is, its importation could 
be blocked if the product does not meet the IEMS.  The fact that 
nations could refuse imports in this way could greatly change 
international trade, CHUGAN warns.  The 20 December MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN asserts that the efforts of advanced countries to protect the 
environment through strengthening regulations can only lead to 
restricted trade.  The paper repeats experts' warnings that if key 
advanced countries are not satisfied with the results of the Uruguay 
Round, a new "green round" will close in faster than expected. 

   An article in the 21 December MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) predicts 
that there may be moves to add an environmental clause when the 
final Uruguay Round agreements are signed in April.  MKS claims 
that, while environmental drives may prevent some of the 
environmental destruction accompanying growing world trade, they 
would also restrain developing and underdeveloped countries' entry 
into the global export market.  The paper warns that if this "green 
round" comes to pass, it will become yet another "attack" of 
"stupendous" trade pressure on South Korea.  This is because key ROK 
industries--steel, cement, textiles, automobiles, etc.--all can be 
linked to environmental problems such as acid rain, global warming, 
or destruction of the ozone layer. 

   ROK firms will pay a price whether they meet environmental 
standards or not, according to MKS.  If firms do not meet the 
standards, their exports can be restricted.  If they do meet the 
standards, their production costs are likely to soar, international 
competitiveness will weaken, and their exports will be pushed out of 
the global market.  To add insult to injury, MKS asserts, ROK firms 
will have to import environmental "know-how" from advanced countries 
in order to bring their operations up to the new standards, and thus 
for a time may be dependent on outside technology.  MKS concludes 
that South Korea must begin preparing for the coming changes.  Firms 
must realize the advantage to long-term investments in pollution 
control, and the ROK industrial structure must shift towards non- 
polluting, clean industries.  Finally, because of reduced budgets in 
recent years, the ROK government has held back investment funds for 
environmental R&amp;D.  It must now begin to nurture and attract 
environmental scientists, technicians, and policy experts in order 
to prepare for the future. 

   FEATURE:  Government Wavers on Mid-Size Airplane Project - 
SUMMARY:  Seoul's current plan to subsidize development of a 50- 
passenger aircraft for use by domestic carriers may be shelved in 
favor of a project for a larger plane built with U.S. technology and 
aimed at the Asia-Pacific market, according to ROK press reports. 
The tie-in with a U.S. manufacturer reportedly would neutralize the 
maneuvers of South Korean firms which have signed agreements with 
Chinese and Russian aerospace companies to enhance their eligibility 
for participation in the government-funded project. 

   The South Korean government has been sending mixed signals on the 
type of mid-size commercial aircraft project it is willing to 
subsidize, Seoul newspapers report.  According to the 19 November 
HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN and 24 November CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the ROK's 
Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) announced its intent 
in March 1993 to make South Korea one of the world's ten leading 
aircraft producers.  The plan called for developing a 50 to 100-seat 
mid-size plane by 1998 with a limited range of 1,600 km, paid for 
with 250 billion won ($312.5 million) in public funds.  After the 
program had succeeded and South Korea accumulated experience and its 
own technology, an international partner was to be sought to share 
the risk on larger aircraft projects. 

   During 1993, the ROK's three fixed-wing aircraft manufacturers, 
Samsung Aerospace, Daewoo Heavy Industries, and Korean Air, and two 
newcomers to the industry, Hyundai Precision and Halla Heavy 
Industries, reportedly tried to enhance their elibigility to 
participate in the mid-size aircraft project by signing agreements 
with Chinese, Russian, and other foreign companies for joint 
development of such a plane (See Pacific Rim Economic Review Vol 2 
No 25, 15 Dec 93 pp 29-30 for details).  Samsung envisioned building 
a 50 to 100-passenger aircraft by 1998, a plan which coincides with 
the original government proposal.  Daewoo and Korean Air layed out 
plans to build in tandem a 100 to 130-seat jetliner also by 1998. 
Hyundai aimed at several new models, including building 30 and 150- 
passenger civilian planes by 1995 and 1999, respectively.  Halla was 
also reported as planning a 50-seat aircraft by 1998, according to 
the 30 November MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS).  All five companies were 
and are motivated by the prospect of government subsidies for R&amp;D 
work in a field with potential spin-offs into other high-tech areas, 
and by the government's intent to declare one firm the "designated 
industry manufacturer," CHUGAN MAEGYONG explains. 

   According to the 15 December MKS, MOTIE's original plan for 
commercial aircraft production was influenced by a Korea Aerospace 
Research Institute (KARI) study which recommended a 50-passenger 
turboprop commuter aircraft as the most appropriate design.  The 
plane would have a maximum cruising speed of 523 km/h, a range of 
2,100 km, and both civilian and military applications.  KARI 
anticipated domestic demand for such a plane to reach 110 units by 
the year 2010.  In KARI's opinion, only after successful development 
and sales of the 50-passenger craft should South Korea go on to 
build a larger plane.  The cost of developing the 50-seater was 
estimated at 279 billion won ($348 million), including 254 billion 
won ($317 million) to develop a prototype, flight test it, and gear 
up for production.  KARI reportedly argued that development of a 
larger, 100 plus-passenger airplane would be "difficult," and that 
there was no demand for such an aircraft.  MOTIE similarly asserts 
that with 90 percent of the 100-seat aircraft market controlled by 
Boeing, McDonnell-Douglas, and Airbus, a South Korean entry of the 
same class could not compete. 

   The 15 December MKS further reports KARI's estimate that the 
"domestic aircraft industry is not set up to design, develop, 
produce, and sell aircraft on its own," and that a "consortium" of 
private manufacturers is needed under the "leadership" of one firm 
with less than 50 percent of the project under its control.  KARI 
also recommended that the ROK government or a government-invested 
agency subsidize part of the cost to boost international confidence 
in the project, enhance the consortium's power to negotiate with 
foreign companies, and "encourage understanding" among the members 
of the consortium. 

   KARI's study, the newspaper reports, drew predictable reactions 
from the contenders.  Samsung supports the 50-seat concept, having 
invested in this design.  Daewoo and Korean Air claim there is no 
demand for such a plane, and are pushing their own 100 plus- 
p,,assenger aircraft.  Hyundai, with both sides covered, can 
accomodate" the government's plan.  No party, however, is satisfied 
with the consortium proposal.  Samsung, widely favored to become the 
"designated industry manufacturer," opposes a consortium on grounds 
it will add "unnecessary" administration and complicate assignment 
of responsibility.  The company wants the consortium to be formed 
after a "leading producer" is designated, according to the 21 
December MKS.  Daewoo and Korean Air reject one company "leadership" 
of the consortium, and want the three companies (themselves and 
Samsung) to have equal shares.  Korean Air is also arguing for new 
priorities aimed at building "first for export, and later for 
domestic demand." 

   There are signs the ROK government may now be changing its 
original concept.  Citing an unidentified "government source," the 
17 November HKS reports that an ROK delegation was instructed to 
discuss with China plans for joint production of a 100 to 150- 
passenger aircraft.  The idea allegedly had been floated by China, 
during a visit there by ROK officials, for a project that would 
involve South Korean capital and Chinese aircraft technology.  The 
same source reportedly stated there were "problems" with PRC civil 
aircraft technology, however, and that the ROK would push for a 
three-way agreement with the United States and China instead.  The 
new ROK proposal, according to HKS, is for the United States to 
supply the technology, South Korea to "contribute" capital, 
manufacturing facilities, and personnel, while China provides basic 
technology and a market for the product. 

   The government source went on to state that Seoul will address 
the question of which of the "three" domestic aircraft manufacturers 
will be selected to participate in the project after talks with the 
United States and China move forward.  In a follow-up article on 19 
November, HKS claims this approach "clearly shows the [government's] 
intent of getting a hold over demand for aircraft in the Asia- 
Pacific region," in contrast to the original plan, which put 
priority on the ROK securing its own developmental technology. 
According to HKS, the new governmewnt stance renders the ROK 
companies' private arrangements to enter the market for mid-size 
aircraft "factually impossible." 

   FEATURE:  KEPCO Official Outlines Plans for Nuclear Power - 
SUMMARY:  South Korea's nuclear power industry will double its 
present capacity upon completion in 2001 of eight new reactors, a 
Korea Electric Power Corporation (KEPCO) official has recently 
written.  By 2006, nuclear facilities will reportedly generate 
nearly half the country's electrical power.  Steps are being taken 
to secure the ROK's "independence" in this sector by indigenizing 
reactor technology, diversifying fuel suppliers, and developing the 
country's own uranium enrichment facilities. 

   Seoul WONJARYOK SANOP (Atomic Power Industry) publishes in its 
November issue an overview of South Korea's plans for nuclear power 
development by Chong Po-hon, chief of KEPCO's Nuclear Power 
Industrial Group.  The magazine states that in 1992, 5.65 million or 
43.2 percent of the country's total electricity production of 13.10 
million kilowatt hours was nuclear-generated, "the highest rate in 
Asia."  Although only 31.6 percent of the generating capacity is 
nuclear, "high utilization rates of 84.5 percent in 1992, and 88.6 
percent for the first nine months of 1993" for the nine reactors now 
producing electrical power in the ROK helped achieve this ratio. 
The reactors were identified in previous press reports as Kori units 
one through four located on the southern coast near Pusan, the first 
unit of which was completed in 1978; Uljin reactors one and two, on 
the country's east coast; and Yonggwang one and two on the west 
coast - all light water reactors.  Wolsong number one in Kyonggi-do 
became operational in 1983, and is South Korea's only heavy water 
reactor at present. 
   The magazine reports that stricter environmental laws will cause 
South Korea to rely even more on nuclear power in the future. 
According to the article, eight more reactors will be built between 
1995 and 2001 with a total capacity of 7.1 million kilowatts, which 
will "double" present capacity and provide 41.3 percent of the 
anticipated electric power demand (expected to grow by 10 percent 
annually).  They include Yonggwang reactors three (1995) and four; 
the 700,000 kw heavy water Wolsong reactor number two in June 1997, 
and units three and four in 1998 and 1999; and the 1 million kw 
Uljin reactors three and four, also in 1998 and 1999.  The magazine 
does not make particular reference to the eighth new reactor.  A 14 
October 1992 KOREA TIMES article, however, stated that nine new 
reactors were planned by 2001:  two at Uljin, three at Wolsong, two 
at Yonggwang by 1996, and another two at Yonggwang by 2001. 

   Between 2000-2006, six more reactors will be built, three on 
existing sites "and three on new sites to be determined," the 
magazine reports.  The 14 new reactors reportedly are part of a plan 
enacted in November 1993 to build an additional 35.96 million kw of 
electric power capacity between 1993-2006, 12.8 million or 35.6 
percent of which will be nuclear. (Earlier ROK press reporting gave 
this same figure of 12.8 million kilowatts from 14 new reactors 
built in five places.)  The magazine states that by 2006, 47.6 
percent of the country's electricity will be nuclear-generated. 

   Steps are being taken to help the ROK secure "independence" in 
nuclear power technology, the magazine reports, through technology 
transfer from foreign countries and training of indigenous 
personnel.  According to the article, 3,240 technicians were needed 
to build and operate South Korea's nine commercial reactors, and 
1,300 more will be needed by 1996.  Yonggwang reactors three and 
four, the first reactors to be built by domestic contractors on the 
basis of foreign technology, are enabling the ROK to "secure a 
foundation for technological independence." 

   Expertise thus acquired is being used in a joint, government- 
backed program involving elements from industry, academe, and 
research institutes to develop a "next-generation nuclear reactor" 
by 2001, according to the magazine.  Its features will include a 
simpler design allowing it to be operated with a minimum of human 
interference, a higher utilization rate, and a service life of 60 
versus 40 years for present models.  The reactor will be "safer and 
more economical."  Operators will have up to 72 hours to repair 
standard breakdowns.  Core damage probability will be one-tenth that 
of present light water reactors.  The magazine also states that the 
ROK "is working on a three-stage plan to develop a standard design 
that can be used to build a power-generating station directly, 
except for details relating to the site."  This description of a 
"next-generation" reactor agrees with reporting in the 27 October 
1993 Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG, which names the project's participants 
as KEPCO, the Korea Atomic Energy Research Institute (KAERI), the 
Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology (KAIST), and the 
Korea Institute of Nuclear Safety. 

   The magazine goes on to report that to secure a safe, economical 
supply of nuclear fuel, South Korea will stop relying "one-sidedly" 
on the United States and diversify its suppliers to include Canada, 
Australia, France, and Russia.  At present, the ROK also depends 
entirely on foreign countries for uranium enrichment.  "After the 
year 2000, domestic needs will exceed one million SWU (separative 
work units), and the quantity of material will be enough to let 
South Korea move on to indigenize the process.  But even then, as 
long as we can procure [enriched uranium] smoothly, there will be no 
need for us to make new efforts on our own."  The magazine states 
"as far as the fuel formation process goes, all the fuel needed for 
light and heavy water reactors is being manufactured domestically." 
Fuel production capacity reportedly will rise to 200 tons annually 
for light water, and 400 tons annually for heavy water reactors by 
June 1997. 

   FEATURE:  ROK Firms Market Workstations Based on U.S. High-Tech - 
SUMMARY:  Hyundai Electronics and Samsung Electronics are both 
marketing "indigenous" high-tech computer workstations equal to the 
best U.S. equipment, according to Seoul press reports.  Hyundai's 
workstations are built around a central processing unit 
"interchangeable" with a chip used in Sun Microsystem's products. 
Samsung's announcement that it will market its own new workstations 
follows by two months a reported agreement to build similar 
equipment for Hewlett-Packard under license. 

   Hyundai Electronics' U.S. subsidiary, a Silicon Valley-based 
company, is reported by the 2 December Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
(MKS) to have "independently" developed a central processing unit 
(CPU) for computer workstations.  The chip has a processing speed of 
66 MHz and can accept 150 million instructions per second, making it 
the "equal" of Hewlett-Packard's PA-RISC chip and Digital's Alpha 
chip.  According to the newspaper, the unit is "interchangeable" 
(hohwan) with Sun Microsystem's "Spark" CPU used in the latter's own 
workstations. 

   "Field tests" of the unit were to be completed by the end of 
1993, MKS reports, and production is scheduled to begin at Hyundai's 
Kyonggi-do plant in September 1994.  Hyundai plans to use the CPU in 
its own workstations, but will also sell it to other South Korean 
manufacturers.  According to MKS, this is the first "indigenous" CPU 
made for workstations manufactured in the ROK.  By the first half of 
1994, Hyundai Electronics will also have "developed" a 100 MHz chip 
for use in its own products. 

   Meanwhile, the 30 November MKS reports that the same Hyundai 
subsidiary has signed an agreement with Europe's largest 
manufacturer of computer workstations, Italy's Olivetti, to export 
Hyundai's top-of-the-line models throughout Europe.  Dealership 
agreements were also made with Marubeni and Kubota for export to 
Japan, and similar arrangements with "four or five large U.S. 
computer distributors."  According to MKS, Hyundai can now compete 
for workstation sales in the United States directly with U.S. firms 
such as Sun and Hewlett-Packard.  Hyundai's subsidiary reportedly 
sold $30 million in workstations in 1993, and looks forward to sales 
of $100 million in 1994 and $300 million in 1995. 

   Hyundai's moves follow a report in the 11 November MKS that its 
chief South Korean rival, Samsung Electronics, will also market 
advanced 75 and 100 MHz workstations in the first half of 1994.  The 
two units reportedly can perform 31 and 38 million floating point 
operations per second, respectively, and the latter figure is equal 
to the "fastest equipment in the world."  According to this issue of 
the newspaper, both workstations were developed "by South Koreans 
with South Korean technology, with no assistance from the U.S. firm 
Hewlet t-Packard." 

   On 18 September, MKS had reported that Samsung Electronics 
contracted with Hewlett-Packard to build the latter's high- 
performance workstations as OEM equipment for sale in the United 
States.  MKS stated that "only a few companies in the world" such as 
H-P, Sun Microsystems, Digital, and Silicon Graphics have this 
technology, and Samsung "plans to take advantage of this opportunity 
to focus its efforts on acquiring high-performance workstation 
technology, and by indigenizing the parts, launch into its own 
development and production as well." 

   Samsung is identified in the 22 December Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG as 
one of several ROK semiconductor manufacturers which target 
financially troubled U.S. employees of "IBM, Apple, Hewlett-Packard" 
and other Silicon Valley-based firms for recruitment.  Image Quest 
Technology, the company's Silicon Valley subsidiary, distinguished 
itself in 1993 by hiring "a large number of specialists in thin film 
technology," the 17 May HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reported.  The case 
was used as an example of how "South Korean electronics companies 
are expanding their efforts through a variety of means to secure the 
leading technological talent in host countries." 

   FEATURE:  Hyundai, Samsung Introduce New Combat Vehicles - 
SUMMARY:  Two ROK defense contractors are advertising new tracked 
recovery vehicles designed to support battlefield operations. 
Hyundai's entry, based on the K-1 tank chassis, will compete for 
export sales with similar equipment produced by the United States. 
Samsung's vehicle is advertised as having "multiple functions" and 
is pictured undergoing performance trials. 

   Hyundai Precision and Samsung Aerospace, two of South Korea's 
largest defense contractors, are each marketing new tracked combat 
recovery vehicles, according to Seoul press reports and 
advertisements.  Hyundai's entry, the larger of the two, is an 
"armored recovery vehicle" (K-1 ARV), which according to the 21 
December 1993 MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) has been under development 
since April 1989.  The vehicle reportedly has a 1,200 hp engine, 
crew space for four, and a top speed of 64 km/h.  A rotating crane 
that lifts 25 tons and a main winch that can pull 70 tons "gives it 
both towing and recovery functions in support of field operations." 
MKS reports that a prototype was ready in March 1991, and that the 
vehicle has been undergoing certification tests.  The ARV will 
enhance the fighting power of ROK forces" while contributing to the 
"indigenization" of other high-tech products, the newspaper states. 
Hyundai reportedly will export the vehicle if it can be made cost 
competitive. 

   Hyundai's ARV has been advertised in the South Korean defense 
technology journal KUKBANG KWA KISUL for the past year, along with 
the company's K-1 tank and K-1 ALVB assault bridge-layer with which 
it shares many features.  Korean text accompanying the photo states 
the ARV is "based on technology used in developing the type-88 
tank."  KUKBANG KWA KISUL's August 1992 issue carried an article by 
the director of Hyundai Precision's Technology Research Institute 
introducing the vehicle and comparing it to similar equipment 
available in nine other countries, including the United States' 
M88A1E1.  According t9 the journal, Hyundai's ARV uses the K-1 power 
train and track assembly.  Overall weight is given as 51,000 kg. 

   Samsung's entry, an "armored combat bulldozer," is described in a 
12-page color brochure circulated by Samsung's aerospace subsidiary. 
The vehicle is advertised as having a combat weight of 24,490 kg, a 
295 hp diesel engine, top speed of 45 km/h on land and 4.8 km/h in 
water, a towing capacity of 14,059 kg, and winch capacity of 11,340 
kg.  Samsung claims the vehicle can be used for dozing, scraping, 
grading, and transport in addition to battlefield recovery 
operations.  Both engine and operator are protected by armor.  The 
vehicle reportedly is equipped for smoke-laying and night 
operations.  (The brochure, which uses Samsung's new logo introduced 
just a few months ago, is entirely in Korean and makes no reference 
to the vehicle's export potential.) 

   Magazine Profiles Financially Troubled U.S. High-Tech Employees - 
A recent article in a Seoul business magazine claimed that Silicon 
Valley, home of the high-tech U.S. semiconductor and computer 
industries, is going through hard times.  Once a mecca for America's 
most talented electronics specialists, the magazine reported 
unemployed Ph.D.'s now roam the streets in pursuit of a dwindling 
number of jobs.  Those of the area's high-tech personnel who still 
have jobs "feel they could be fired at any time."  As IBM, Apple, 
Hewlett-Packard and other giants undergo downsizing, and other 
companies leave the Valley in search of cheaper places to do 
business, the number of companies laying off workers to survive is 
rapidly increasing. 

   Those unable to find jobs can lose their homes within months. 
Because of the area's high cost of living, few have been able to 
accumulate enough savings to sustain a job search.  It is estimated 
that only 1 percent of a company's employees have more than $500 in 
cash, meaning that the "people live in fear of receiving separation 
notices." 

   Silicon Valley companies are cutting back expenses, automating, 
demanding long hours from employees, and immersing themselves in R&amp;D 

in a "desperate struggle" to stay in business.  "Ironically, 
America's high-tech competitiveness is being strengthened by such 
agony."  While the U.S. firms fight to survive, South Korean 
companies "such as the Samsung Group periodically take out full page 
ads in the area's newspapers to recruit engineers, and have been 
able to scout out talented personnel for a relatively modest cost." 
(Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG 22 Dec 93 pp 76-79) 

   Samsung Develops ROK's First Indigenous Color CRT's - Samsung 
Electron Devices, a subsidiary of the Samsung Group, has built the 
country's first indigenous 15" and 17" color cathode ray tubes 
(CRT's), and will move full-scale into mass production.  The company 
spent 3 billion won ($375 million) and 30 months on development, and 
stands to realize an annual savings of more than 100 billion won 
($125 million) on import costs.  Samsung plans to manufacture 
100,000 sets per month, some of which will be supplied to other ROK 
manufacturers.  Their success will enable South Korea to "completely 
indigenize" commercial color monitors, breaking the "world monopoly" 
Japan has held on these products.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 22 
Dec 93 p 8) 

   Comment:  A report in the 11 December Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, p 3, calls into question the extent to which Samsung's feat 
was indigenous.  According to the Japanese newspaper, Samsung last 
September bought out the former East German color CRT manufacturer 
WF (now the SEB Co.).  Samsung then signed a joint venture agreement 
with another German company, the color CRT glassmaker FGT, which the 
Tokyo paper claims has given the South Korean firm technology to 
manufacture complete sets. 

   KOTRA Expanding, Automating Commercial Intelligence Network - The 
Korea Trade Promotion Corporation (KOTRA) is building a "trade 
information data system" that links all of its 81 overseas trade 
offices to better promote ROK exports.  The semi-official 
organization will initially spend 3 billion won ($375 million) 
completing the "KOTRA Global Network" by making Los Angeles and 
Singapore the second and third "core cities" of its information 
network after Brussels, which "covers" Europe, Africa, and the 
Middle East.  In conjunction with this, KOTRA is compiling an 
electronic data base by country that includes trade-related 
information, such as local business contacts, which its offices can 
access by on-line computer.  KOTRA has collected several thousand 
"intelligence reports" on trade issues that pertain to different 
countries and hundreds of product and company surveys that will be 
made available to the ROK government and corporations.  KOTRA will 
also finish plans next year for a "Combined Trade Information 
Research Center" to be built in the Kangnam district of the capital. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 22 Dec 93 p 8) 

   KOTRA's database is one of many information networks maintained 
by South Korean government, government-affiliated, and corporate 
institutes targeted on foreign commerce and technology, according to 
ROK press reports.  The Korea Institute of Science and Technology 
(KIST) reportedly keeps a file on Korean scholars living in Japan to 
facilitate technology transfers to South Korea, the 15 March MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) stated.  The same paper on 7 May referred to a 
database maintained by the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy 
(MOTIE) on foreign commercial, trade, and patents information; it 
also described a new "R&amp;D Information Center" set up by KIST to 
collect foreign S&amp;T information for distribution to ROK consumers. 
On 19 May, MKS reported the Ministry of Science and Technology's own 
efforts to create a database aimed at "effectively utilizing" 
expatriate Koreans "as collectors of S&amp;T information."  Samsung's 
"Overseas Areas Research Institute," which reportedly maintains a 
database of foreign "commercial intelligence," was the subject of 
reporting by two Seoul magazines (see Pacific Rim Economic Review No 
2 Vol 17, 25 Aug 93 pp 22-27).  The same company's "Talented 
Personnel Development Research Institute" was said by the 24 August 
MKS to maintain records "on more than one thousand overseas 
'brains,' primarily doctorate-level personnel living in the United 
States." 

   Tariff Reductions on High-Tech Imports Extended - The temporary 
tariff reduction on imports of some defense and high-tech industrial 
goods, which had been set to expire at the end of 1993, will be 
extended until 1997.  However, the Ministry of Finance (MOF) 
announced that the tariff reduction will by lowered by 5 percentage 
points each year, so that the current reduction rate of 35 percent 
will drop to 20 percent in the final year.  The MOF said that 707 of 
the 1,089 import items that currently receive reduced tariffs will 
automatically receive the reduced rate.  The Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) has requested that the remaining 382 
items be excluded from the reduction list, but the MOF has said that 
these items will also receive the tariff reduction if import reports 
are made by 28 February.  (Seoul THE KOREA HERALD 4 Jan 94 p 8) 
Seoul Bureau 

   KEPCO Wins Contract To Provide Nuclear Technology to China - The 
Korea Electric Power Corporation (KEPCO) has won a contract to 
provide technological support for the management of a nuclear power 
plant in China's Guandong Province.  The contract was signed in 
China on 20 December by KEPCO President Yi Chong-hun and Zan 
Yunlong, president of the Guangdong Nuclear Power Joint Venture 
Company.  (Seoul THE KOREA HERALD 23 Dec 93 p 8) Seoul Bureau 

   Kodeco Energy To Develop Oil, Gas Facilities in Indonesia - 
Kodeco Energy Company has signed a contract with the Indonesian 
National Petroleum Development Corporation (Pertamina) to develop 
oil and natural gas in Indonesia's Poleng mining area.  Kodeco will 
be in charge of operations and Pertamina will be in charge of 
management.  Kodeco will invest $19.18 million over the next 10 
years to repair old facilities and build new equipment.  Reserves in 
the Poleng mining area, 25 km North of Madura, are estimated at 2.18 
million barrels of oil and 10.95 billion cubic meters (36.5 billion 
cubic feet) of gas.  Kodeco will have a 35-percent share of the gas 
and a 15-percent share of the oil that is developed, with Pertamina 
receiving the remainder.  Kodeco will also provide gas from the 
Poleng mining area to the Indonesian National Electric Power 
Corporation. (Seoul YONHAP 0429 GMT 24 Dec 93) Seoul Bureau 

   Tongbu Group To Expand Overseas Business - Tongbu Group is making 
inroads into overseas markets by setting up plants and developing 
overseas resources.  It has set up strategies to move into China, 
Vietnam, and Australia.  The group has already finished a 
feasibility study on developing a bituminous coal mine in China's 
Heilongjiang Province, and plans to conclude a joint venture 
contract in January.  It is also speeding up plans to set up a 
superphosphate fertilizer plant in Vietnam.  Tongbu is also waiting 
to hear of the results of a bid it made on a bituminous coal mine in 
Australia.  It participated jointly with other ROK businesses on the 
bid.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 4 Jan 94 p 10) Seoul Bureau 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Singapore Top Investor in Non-Gas 
Sector - According to the Indonesian Coordinating Board of 
Investment, Singapore has invested $1.17 billion in 42 non-gas 
sector projects in the first 10 months of 1993.  Cumulatively, 
Singapore ranks fourth in the value of total investments. 
Singapore's major investments are mainly in the electronics 
component industries in Batam Island.  (Jakarta MERDEKA 18 Dec 93 p 
9) Bangkok Bureau 

   Non-Gas Exports to Japan Increase - The National Export Promotion 
Board recently stated that Indonesia's non-gas exports to Japan over 
the last 10 months of 1993 rose by 22.7 percent compared to the same 
period of the previous year--from $3.26 billion to $4.001 billion. 
This is considered a "big increase" because Japan's rise in imports 
of non-gas products from other countries was only 5.23 percent. 
(Jakarta KOMPAS 17 Dec 93 p 2) Bangkok Bureau 

   LAOS:  Nam Song Water Project With Japan Signed - Electricite du 
Laos (EDL) and Japan's Hazama Corporation recently signed an 
agreement for the construction of the Nam Song Project.  The 
project, financed by a $31.5-million loan from the Asian Development 
Bank, involves diverting water from the Nam Song River to the Nam 
Ngum Reservoir to generate electricity.  An annual increase of 137 
million KWH from the present 860 million KWH is expected. 
(Vientiane KPL 0758 GMT 24 Dec 93) Bangkok Bureau 

   Exports, Imports for 1993 Reported - In 1993 Laos generated $220 
million in revenues from exports, a 4-percent increase over the 
original plan, while imports rose to $385 million, 12 percent higher 
than the previous year.  The Ministry of Commerce attributes this 
change to the rise of Laos as a transshipment point for goods such 
as vehicles, garments, electrical devices, utensils, and livestock, 
and "home-made" exports such as electricity, lead ore, gypsum, 
benzoin, coffee beans, and garments.  (Vientiane KPL 0809 GMT 24 Dec 
93) Bangkok Bureau 

   PHILIPPINES:  Finland To Supply Digital Cellular Equipment - 
Finland's Nokia Telecommunications has won a $30-million contract 
from Globe Telecom to supply digital cellular equipment based on the 
Global System for Mobile Communications (GSM).  The contract is the 
first phase of Globe Telecom's $100-million investment in its 
cellular mobile telephone system.  The remaining $70 million is to 
be used for successive phases.  Nokia will supply the entire GSM 
network infrastructure, including DX200 mobile switching centers, 
GSM base stations, etc.  Nokia will also provide related services 
such as network planning, implementation, commissioning, and 
planning.  (Manila BUSINESS WORLD 21 Dec 93 p 10) Bangkok Bureau 

   Investment Board Approves Geothermal, Cement Projects - The Board 
of Investments (BOI) has approved three major projects worth $500 
million.  These include the 231-MW geothermal plant of Visayas 
Geothermal Power Corp., as well as projects for the Southern Cross 
Cement Corp., and expansion of Rohm Electronics, Philippines.  The 
geothermal plant project will be undertaken by a Dutch company, 
while 40 percent of the cement production venture is backed by 
Japanese investors.  Rohm is a Japan-based electronics company. 
(Manila MANILA BULLETIN 24 Dec 93 p b-1) Bangkok Bureau 

   Volvo To Establish Assembly Plant - The Board of Investments 
(BOI) has approved the construction of an automobile assembly plant 
by Scandinavian Motors Corp., makers of Volvo luxury cars. 
Scandinavian Motors will invest $12 million and begin operations in 
a year.  (Manila THE MANILA CHRONICLE 30 Dec 93 p 11) Bangkok Bureau 

   Investments in Processing Zones Hit $107 Million in 1993 - The 
Export Processing Zone Authority capped its operations in 1993 with 
a 13-percent gain in investments as fresh capital inflows rose to 
$107 million compared with $94 million in the previous year.  The 
bulk of new investments again came from the Asia-Pacific region, 
with the Japanese dominating the investment list at $58 million, up 
from $44 million during the previous year.  Filipino investors 
pumped in $18 million during the period, up from $11.6 million the 
previous year. (Manila PHILIPPINE DAILY INQUIRER 31 Dec 93 p 17) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   SINGAPORE:  Government Sets Up $600-Million Industrial 
Development Fund - Trade and Industry Minister S. Dhanabalan 
announced recently that the Singapore Government has set up a $600- 
million Industrial Development Fund to develop the capabilities of 
Singapore companies on an industry-wide or cluster basis. He said 
the fund will be used to attract high-technology companies to 
Singapore by participating as a risk and cost-sharing partner with 
them; to accelerate development of local enterprises so that they 
will play an increasingly strategic role in developing Singapore's 
manufacturing sector; and for strategic investments with local and 
multinational companies in "good projects in the region."  The fund 
will be managed by the Economic Development Board.  (Singapore THE 
STRAITS TIMES 28 Dec 93 p 1)  Bangkok Bureau 

   Aerospace Industry Reports 6.2-Percent Growth in 1993 - The local 
aerospace sector grew by 6.2 percent and reached an estimated output 
of $900 million, according to Deputy Director Chow Tat Kong of 
Singapore's Economic Development Board.  Mr. Chow attributed the 
relatively good performance to the Asia-Pacific region's emergence 
as the most promising market for the aerospace industry worldwide. 
The sector attracted investment commitments of more than $900 
million in 1993, a 29-percent increase over the previous year. 
(Singapore THE STRAITS TIMES 28 Dec 93 p 35) Bangkok Bureau 

   THAILAND:  Central Bank Reviews Growth, Balance of Payments - 
Thailand's economic growth rate for 1993 is likely to end up between 
8 and 8.2 percent, higher than the 7.5 percent projected because of 
better export performance, according to the Bank of Thailand. 
Central Bank Spokesman Phisit Li-atham said that exports during the 
first 11 months of 1993 rose 13.1 percent and the bank expects 
exports for all of 1993 to grow by 13 percent.  The original 
projection was 11.5 percent.  The increase has been driven mainly by 
a 70-percent jump in the value of exports to Japan, partly because 
of the stronger yen.  -Exports to the United States were up 39 
percent, partly because the U.S. economy is recovering, and because 
Washington has dropped the threat of trade sanctions after receiving 
Thai promises to crack down on copyright violators. If the 1993 
growth rate ends up above 8 percent, projections for 1994--now 
ranging from 7.8 percent to 8.6 percent--may have to be revised. 

   The central bank also reported that Thailand's trade deficit had 
narrowed to $628 million in November from $830 million in October 
and $910 million a year earlier.  However, Thailand's cumulative 
trade deficit in the January to November period widened to an 
estimated $8.16 billion from $7.54 billion in January to November 
1992.  The bank said exports rose 13.1 percent during the first 11 
months to $33.4 billion, while imports rose 12.1 percent, to $41.7 
billion.  It said overall industrial exports increased 17.6 percent 
with plastic product exports and computer chip sales at the top of 
the list.  Electronics, jewelry, and furniture exports also posted a 
robust growth. 
   The current-account deficit grew to about $6.3 billion in the 
first 11 months from $6.2 billion a year earlier.  The balance of 
payments surplus rose sharply to $5.3 billion from $1.6 billion a 
year earlier because of an influx of foreign investment in Thai 
stocks.  The bank said the net inflow of foreign funds into the Thai 
stock market ballooned to $2.4 billion from January to November, 
compared to $440 million in the previous year.  The bank said Thai 
foreign reserves fell slightly to $25.2 billion at the end of 
November.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST S Jan 94 p 17) Bangkok Bureau 

   Siam Steel To Invest in Three Projects - Siam Steel Group, the 
largest steel furniture and products manufacturer in Thailand, plans 
to invest $84 million in three projects next year.  It will 
manufacture specially coated steel pipes and satellite dishes, and 
establish an industrial estate.  Group president Wanchai 
Khunananthakun said the first project, costing $40 million, would be 
a joint venture with Matsushita Electrical Works, Ltd. of Japan to 
produce Pana Coat, a specially coated steel pipe.  The second 
project, an industrial estate costing $40 million, will be entirely 
funded by the group.  The group will also spend $8 million on 
manufacturing satellite dishes.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 27 Dec 93 p 
15) Bangkok Bureau 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Privatization of State Enterprises Slower 
Than Expected - SUMMARY:  Although Prime Minister Vo Van Kiet once 
again confirmed in a November Cabinet meeting that introduction of 
shareholding at state enterprises is "a major policy of both the 
Party and the State," a Ministry of Finance report reveals that by 
the end of 1993 perhaps only three to five state enterprises will 
have been converted to public shareholding ownership.  The ministry 
reportedly believes this conversion rate is "far too slow." 

   According to the 5 December Hanoi LAO DONG, a recent Finance 
Ministry report states that only 19 state enterprises have signed up 
for privatization more than 16 months after the Council of Ministers 
Chairman (now Prime Minister) announced a decision to continue a 
pilot project to convert some state enterprises into shareholding 
companies in accordance with resolutions of the Party and the 
National Assembly.  Nine firms are from northern provinces, 10 from 
southern provinces and none from the central provinces, with only 
two enterprises fully converted.  They are the Federated Transport 
Agents Company (previously under the Ministry of Communications and 
Transportation) and the Refrigeration Equipment Works Enterprise (Ho 
Chi Minh City).  Some firms have finished estimating their overall 
worth as part of the privatization process and more than 10 are 
reportedly still interested in privatization, but want to ask the 
government to loosen regulations so that their workers can get 
higher salaries after conversion to private ownership.  An earlier 
report in the 11-17 November THOI BAO KINH TE from Ho Chi Minh City, 
perhaps inadvertently, pointed out the small scale of privatization 
activity so far, noting that as of June there are more than 6,000 
state enterprises nationwide. 

   LAO DONG cites various reasons for the slow rate of 
privatization. In many localities few people really understand 
privatization and claim it "strays from the socialist path."  Many 
enterprise officials are confused about the process of starting and 
implementing the conversion to a shareholding system.  Some 
province-level party committees and government administrators are 
reportedly still awaiting separate decisions from the Politburo or 
Party Secretariat on privatization, oblivious to the fact that this 
policy has already been endorsed by the Party's Central Executive 
Committee.  In the meantime, workers' concerns are being felt, with 
many of them expressing fear that their pay will be cut.  In some 
areas, workers reportedly think that conversion to a shareholding 
system simply means divvying up state property and assets to 
individuals, and have raised "unrealistic demands."  According to a 
Finance Ministry report, there have been demands that an enterprise 
be sold to its workers with only a 15-percent downpayment, with the 
rest to be paid back over 10 years. 

   LAO DONG says that there are many reasons why the conversion of 
state enterprises into shareholding companies has been slow, but the 
major factor is that it has been made more or less voluntary. 
Furthermore, detailed and clear regulations and education concerning 
the policy have been lacking.  Many mistakes have also been made in 
calculating the assets of enterprises to be privatized. 

   LAO DONG asserts that the time has come for party and government 
organs at all levels to closely review the privatization program so 
that they can find ways to speed it up and boost the country's 
development. 

   Air Traffic Control To Receive $26-Million Upgrade - The National 
Air Routes Administration Center (Civil Aviation Department) has 
just started construction of a short/long range communications and 
radar control station at Tan Son Nhat airport as the first step in 
building a communications/radar network for the Ho Chi Minh City FIR 
(Flight Information Region).  The communications/radar network will 
consist of three stations:  at Tan Son Nhat airport, on the Son Tra 
peninsula (Da Nang), and at Quy Nhon.  The network stations will be 
equipped with RSM-970 long-range radars (450-km radius), TRAC-2000 
radars with 150-km coverage, and Eurocat-200 signal processing 
centers produced by the French firm Thompson CFS.  These three 
communications/radar stations will relay data to and from the Ho Chi 
Minh City air traffic control center via four satellite ground 
stations at Hanoi, Da Nang, Quy Nhon and Ho Chi Minh City. 

   This project represents an investment of $26 million in equipment 
plus more than $2 million for construction work.  When completed, 
the network will service not only domestic flights, but also flights 
between the Ho Chi Minh City control region and other air control 
centers (ACC) in Laos, Cambodia, Thailand, Singapore, Hong Kong, 
Malaysia and the Philippines. 

   In addition to this $26-million network, the National Air Routes 
Administration Center also plans to convert the NDB system (Non- 
Directional Beacons) at Moc Chau, Ninh Binh, and Long Khanh into 
Omnidirectional Radio Range - Distance Measuring Equipment (VOR DME) 
mode, and install other VOR DME stations at Con Son, Dong Hoi, Cat 
Bi, and Phu Bai. 

   The center has also started construction of a new runway lighting 
system AFLS (Automatic Flight Landing System) and a new landing 
system ILS/DME (Instrument Landing System/Distance Measuring 
Equipment) at Da Nang airport.  This will allow aircraft to land 
safely despite poor visibility at night or in bad weather.  These 
two projects will cost nearly $2 million for equipment and more than 
$200,000 for related construction costs. 

   It is estimated that all of the above projects will be basically 
completed in the first quarter of 1994.  (Hanoi LAO DONG 2 Dec 93 pp 
1,2) 

   Foreign Investment in Agriculture Noted - To date, of the 740 
foreign investment projects in Vietnam, some 54 projects capitalized 
at more than $600 million deal with the agricultural sector.  This 
does not include a separate agricultural project in the Red River 
delta funded by the World Bank in the amount of $240 million.  Most 
foreign investment projects in the agricultural sector involve the 
processing of agricultural products and the construction of model 
agricultural factories.  Some 16 projects are under the direct 
management of the Ministry of Agriculture and Food Industry, with 
companies from Japan, Singapore, Taiwan, Thailand, France, Hong 
Kong, and the Commonwealth of Independent States participating.  (Ho 
Chi Minh City THANH NIEN 28 Nov 93-5 Dec 93 p 3) 

   Increase in Ho Chi Minh City Production Reported - According to 
the Department of Statistics, Ho Chi Minh City's 1993 general 
domestic production increased by 24 percent, or $3.325 billion, over 
the previous year.  The city's net domestic income also increased 
about 30 percent.  Compared to 1992, its industrial production 
increased more than 26 percent, while agricultural production was up 
1 percent, and internal trade, communications, and transport rose 
more than 20 percent.  Its total investment increased by 80 percent, 
or about $891 million, compared to 1992.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 
1100 GMT 2 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Garment Industry Production Noted - Vietnam's garment exports in 
1993 totaled $300 million, or 36.3 percent more than the previous 
year.  The country has set a target for garment exports of $1.2 
billion in the year 2000 and $3.9 billion in 2005.  For the domestic 
market, it also plans to increase production to 110 million items in 
1995 and 175 million in 2005.  According to the Vietnam Garment 
Manufacture, Import-Export Corporation, the country now has 125 
garment manufacturing and service establishments equipped with 
nearly 40,000 machines, many of them imported from Japan, Germany 
and South Korea.  (Hanoi VNA 1443 GMT 5 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   French, Thai, Local Companies Enter Liquid Gas Venture - The 
French company Total and the Thai company BBP have entered a venture 
with a Vietnamese company to establish a gas processing plant in Ba 
Ria-Vung Tau. The $50-million plant will produce liquid gas for 
domestic use with an estimated annual capacity of 800,000 tons. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam Network 1000 GMT 18 Dec 93) Bangkok Bureau 

   Aid From French Ministry of Finance Reported - The French 
Ministry of Finance is granting Vietnam $100 million under the 
framework of the Paris international conference on Vietnam.  France 
ranks second among countries making financial commitments to 
Vietnam.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam Network 1000 GMT 18 Dec 93) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Association Reports Record Output in 1993 - The Vietnam 
Information and Electronics Association has posted a record output 
and turnover for 1993, doubling its previous year's performance. 
The Association of fourteen companies operating nationwide has 
assembled T.V. sets, cassette recorders, computers, and thousands of 
other electronic products for export, with a total turnover of over 
$71 million.  (Hanoi VNA in English 0639 GMT 24 Dec 93) Bangkok 
Bureau 

   Hanoi's Industrial Production Grows 16.8 Percent - Hanoi's 1993 
industrial production grew by 16.8 percent, up 2.6 percent over the 
previous year, according to the Statistics Department.  A sharp 
increase was recorded in footwear--121 percent; garments--34 
percent; metallurgy--42.4 percent; ceramics and glassware--41 
percent; printing--32 percent; and chemicals--30.3 percent.  The 
central state-owned sector marked a steady growth rate while the 
non-state sector showed a growth rate of 20.4 percent.  The success 
was attributed to the rapid expansion of privately owned companies 
and businesses.  (Hanoi VNA 1349 GMT 27 Dec 93) Bangkok Bureau 

   Expansion of Hoang Thach Cement Plant Commences - The Ministry of 
Construction and the Vietnam Cement Corporation have started 
construction of the second production line of the Hoang Thach cement 
plant in the northern province of Hai Hung.  The $85-million line, 
supplied by Denmark's F. L. Smith Company, has a design capacity of 
1.1 million tons annually, and is expected to be operational by the 
end of 1996.  The first line of the plant, also with a design 
capacity of 1.1 million tons a year, was put into operation in 1983. 
To date it has turned out nearly 6.8 million tons of cement.  (Hanoi 
VNA 0515 GMT 29 Dec 93) Bangkok Bureau 

   Ayun River, Be River Dammed for Irrigation, Electric Projects - 
The Ayun River was dammed recently as part of an irrigation project 
in Gia Lai Province.  Construction of the $40-million Ayunpa 
irrigation project started in March 1990 and is expected to be 
completed in late 1997.  The main facilities of the project include 
a 40m-high, 342m-long dam, a three-gate spillway with a flow of 
1,456 cubic meters per second, and a 3,700-hectare reservoir.  When 
completed, the project will bring water to 13,500 hectares of two- 
crop rice fields in nine communes of Ayunpa District.  In the first 
stage after the damming of the Ayun river, the project will water 
1,500 hectares of the 1993-1994 spring-winter crop. (Hanoi VNA 0607 
GMT 29 Dec 93) 

   The damming of the Be river for the Thac Mo hydroelectric power 
plant, northeast of Ho Chi Minh City, took place recently.  Water 
from the river will fill a 11,900-hectare reservoir with a capacity 
of 1,2SO to 1,360 million cubic meters to operate two turbines with 
a combined capacity of 150 MW.  The first turbine is expected to 
become operational in June 1994 and the second will be completed by 
the end of next year.  By then, the $156.4 million plant will 
provide 610 million kwh annually.  (Hanoi VNA 0650 GMT 29 Dec 93) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Postal Sector's Phone Service Reports Increase in Revenues - In 
1993 the postal sector grossed more than $161.8 million, nearly 
doubling its 1992 receipts.  The postal sector assembled 49.64 
percent more telephones over 1992.  At present there are 0.37 
telephones for every 100 people, compared with 0.26 in 1992.  In 
particular, six digital telephone exchanges were recently 
commissioned in the provinces of Tuyen Quang, Ha Giang, Son La, Lai 
Chau, Cao Bang, and Yen Bai.  All 53 provinces and cities throughout 
the country are now linked to international digital networks.  The 
north-south 1,830-km fiber optic cable was commissioned with a 
capacity of 34 megabits, the 140-megabit wide-band microwave from 
Hanoi to Nha Trang was completed, and many narrow-band microwave 2- 
megabit digital interprovincial lines with a total length of 168,000 
km were completed.  Phone services have also reached rural and 
mountain areas.  At present, 221 out of 527 districts and townships 
have digital telephone exchanges.  More than 600 out of 1,000 
villages in the country have 12,680 telephones.  In addition, 
Vietnam owns 1,000 international telephone channels and 32 direct 
links with other countries.  International telephone calls in 1993 
reached 83 million minutes, twice the 1992 total.  The good 
performance in 1993 resulted from the investment of $230 million in 
200 projects, double the previous year's input.  (Hanoi VNA 1351 GMT 
29 Dec 93) Bangkok Bureau 

   Foreign Investments in Quang Nam-Da Nang Noted - The Central 
Province of Quang Nam-Da Nang has attracted 23 foreign investment 
projects in 1993 with a total capital of $130 million.  Le Quoc 
Khanh, chairman of the provincial people's council, stated that the 
development priority for the province in 1994 would include 
infrastructure, tourism, and promotion of traditional trade.  (Hanoi 
VNA 1000 GMT 29 Dec 93) Bangkok Bureau 
EAG/12JAN94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/PF 12/2138z Jan 

